http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/arts/design/31kief.html?ex=1338264000&en=cc09a0243f94285b&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss foreground, and behind it a &#147;house&#148; in &#147;Falling Stars,&#148; Anselm Kiefer&#146;s May 30 — Anselm Kiefer thinks big. at Anselm Kiefer Since moving to France in 1993, this German-born artist has turned his 50-acre property in Provence into a sprawling installation, with a former silk factory serving as his studio, and warehouses, greenhouses, towers and tunnels displaying his huge paintings and sculpturing the landscape. Now this same penchant for working on a monumental scale has made Mr. Kiefer the ideal artist to inaugurate an annual solo show — called, appropriately, Monumenta — that opened on Wednesday in the cavernous space of Paris. It continues through July 8. Mr. Kiefer, 62, whose specific exhibition is titled “Falling Stars,” will be followed next year by Richard Serra, the American sculptor of weighty shapes in sheet metal. Christian Boltanski, the French installation artist who often fills entire rooms with one work of art, has been chosen for 2009. Though the artists have the privilege — and challenge — of presenting their art in a unique setting, the show’s organizer, the French government, hopes to be the main beneficiary. Having recently completed a prolonged $135 million restoration of a vast, light-drenched glass and steel palace originally built for the 1900 Universal Exhibition here — the French Culture Ministry has been struggling to find a mission for the space, which is 150 feet wide, 660 feet long and 150 feet tall at its highest point. At the same time the government has been trying to kick-start public interest in contemporary art for several years now. Last year it sponsored “La Force de l’Art” (“The Strength of Art”), an exhibition of French-based artists But the show was poorly received, not least because the art was overwhelmed by the space. Monumenta, then, is designed both to show off to create a buzz around today’s new art. For Mr. Kiefer it also represents his grand debut in Paris. A soft-spoken and introspective man, he made his name in Germany and the United States in the 1970s and 1980s with large-format paintings and lead sculptures that stirred buried memories of the Holocaust and delved into the myths of Germany’s past. Britons discovered his art through an installation at the Royal Academy of Arts and a Cube Gallery in London. His work also features in the permanent collection of the Guggenheim Bilbao, in northwestern Spain, which, by coincidence, is holding a survey exhibition of his recent paintings through Sept. 3. But while Mr. Kiefer presented six 30-foot-high paintings in the chapel of the Hôpital de la Salpêtrière in 2000 and held a Thaddaeus Ropac here last year, it is only now that the Parisian public is being introduced to the unusual work he has been developing at La Ribaute, his retreat outside Barjac in southern France. While “Falling Stars” includes new paintings, Mr. Kiefer has transferred some of La Ribaute to building seven stand-alone houses, or galleries, each some 50 feet high, and bringing three concrete towers that normally stand on his property. This installation has in turn had the desired effect of occupying the palace, both physically and visually. His show’s title is itself a reference to its glass roof. “We are beneath the sky, below the firmament,” he told reporters. Yet as much as with his constructions, Mr. Kiefer fills the space with the visual and intellectual force of his art, much of it inspired by literature, notably the poetry of the Romanian Paul Celan and the Austrian Ingeborg Bachmann, the Bible and cabalistic writings. Mr. Kiefer himself has often noted that in his youth he wavered between becoming a writer and a painter. No less distinctive are the materials he uses, with sunflowers, branches, pieces of cloth, terra cotta pottery, plaster, dried mud and lead objects often attached to thick layers of paint. Similarly he creates what he calls books with sheets of lead, some of which he rescued from Cologne Cathedral when its roof was being replaced some years ago. The show’s first house, “Land of Fog,” inspired by Bachmann’s poem of the same name, presents a single painting that suggests a sacrificial Aztec pyramid. At its foot lies a naked man — “It is me,” Mr. Kiefer said — below a large terra cotta heart attached to the painting. Anselm Kiefer’s “Falling Stars,” the first exhibition in the Monumenta series, runs through July 8 3 Avenue du Général Eisenhower, Paris; monumenta.com or 33 1 44-13-17-17. Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Op-Ed Contributor: Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Go, Eat, You Never Know Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Google Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq off Times delivery.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/books/31masl.html From Hitmaker to Defendant, a of the Times From Hitmaker to Defendant, a Spector, the record producer, shown in 1975, is the subject of a new biography, &#8220;Tearing by Mick Brown, right. December 2002 the British journalist Mick Brown was driven by ’s chauffeur in Phil Spector’s white Rolls-Royce to Phil Spector’s gloomy castle in Alhambra, Calif., for a spooky interview with Phil Spector, who wore black silk pajamas and made a grand entrance to the strains of Handel. DOWN THE WALL OF SOUND The Rise and Fall of Phil Spector Illustrated. 452 pages. Alfred A. Knopf. $26.95. Times Topics: Phil Spector Two months later Lana Clarkson, a tall blond actress who had starred in two “Barbarian Queen” movies and delivered the line “Hi” in “Fast Times at Ridgemont High,” died violently at the same house. The opening chapter of Mr. Brown’s Spector biography insinuates that the visiting interviewer might also have been in peril. But it was Mr. Spector, the tiny, Napoleonic, gun-toting rock ’n’ roll genius who was in jeopardy on that day. Mr. Brown was in the midst of compiling a seriously damning, though not even actively malevolent, set of stories about the Spector life and oeuvre. Grouped together in the bloodcurdling biography they add up to a portrait of pure self-interest and cruelty, tempered only slightly by the great musical achievements of Mr. Spector’s golden age in the early 1960s. This book would feel like a crime story even if its subject were not currently on trial for Ms. Clarkson’s murder. Mr. Brown is not a muckraker. Nor is he really discovering anything new, at least not in the first half of Mr. Spector’s story. As many Spector acquaintances and scorched musical collaborators report, Mr. Spector’s autocratic nature was thought to have obvious sources. There was his father’s suicide (which led to the hit “To Know Him Is to Love Him,” with its title taken from Benjamin Spector’s gravestone). There were an overbearing mother and sister, Bertha and Shirley. There was also the possibility of inbreeding, since this rock maestro had both paternal and maternal grandfathers named George Spector and Phil’s parents were thought to be first cousins. There were the schoolyard bullies whose persecution supposedly explained the adult Phil Spector’s cadre of bodyguards. This first part of after sketchily defining Mr. Spector’s pathology, is mostly devoted to explaining how the famous Wall of Sound was created. For those who know the musical history of this period, which has been expertly documented elsewhere, this part of the book holds little surprise beyond the elaborate skein of creative connections. Mr. Brown underscores the cause-and-effect links between certain recordings, like the Beach Boys’ “Don’t Worry Baby” with Mr. Spector’s production for the Ronettes, “Be My Baby,” or the Four Tops’ “Baby, I Need Your Loving” with the monster, Spector-produced Righteous Brothers hit, “You’ve Lost that Lovin’ Feeling.” He also explains the ubiquitousness of singers like Darlene Love, who might perform under different names at Mr. Spector’s whim and then wind up with nothing to show for it. The consensus expressed in the book is that Mr. Spector habitually betrayed and discarded musicians after he was through with them. “Rather than develop his artists’ careers,” Mr. Brown quotes the Atlantic Records pioneer Jerry Wexler as saying, “Phil developed himself.” But just as the Spector mystique was being hyperbolically immortalized by ’s 1964 magazine article “The First Tycoon of Teen” (which, as Mr. Brown points out, compares Mr. Spector with ), the Spector career hit a ceiling. This book maintains that Mr. Spector, unlike some of the artists he disparages (notably the Beach Boys’ Brian Wilson), began to stall as the world changed around him. “He was like a little boy who does something really cute and gets applauded for that,” says Bruce Johnston, the former Beach Boy, “and so he starts figuring out how to get the applause back, but then it’s not quite as cute again.” At this point the book begins to overflow with not-quite-as-cute effluvia. Borrowing from the sad, lurid memoir of Ronnie Spector, whose career with the Ronettes took a nosedive after she married her producer and disappeared under Mr. Spector’s possessive wing, it describes a lonely household that became a prison. Not for nothing was “Citizen Kane” Mr. Spector’s favorite film at the time. The Manson murders and the disastrous adoptions of three Spector children (later virtually abandoned by their father) only worsened the atmosphere of deterioration. In court testimony it was alleged that Ms. Spector drank to “shut out the continuous stream of shrieking by the respondent.” Said respondent would go on to pay Ms. Spector a court- ordered interim support payment of $1,250 in nickels. Professionally he grew to be “like Sherlock Holmes without a case.” His magisterial “Be My Baby” became background music in an advertisement for Cialis, the erectile dysfunction drug. And his attempted comebacks and collaborations (the most successful of which, in Mr. Brown’s opinion, being ’s “Imagine”) grew ever crazier. He famously aimed a gun at the neck of the singer and declared “Leonard, I love you,” prompting Mr. Cohen to reply drolly “I hope you do, Phil.” Working with Mr. Spector, says someone who attended their collaborative sessions, “gave Leonard a chance to perfect his Shaolin priesthood stuff and become one with the universe.” That was the degree of patience a Spector run-in required. While with a title that perfectly describes its subject’s gift for self-destruction, does find those who appreciated Mr. Spector’s brilliance, humor and occasional wild generosity (“Phil, how can you give a thousand-dollar tip to the waiters but you won’t pay over scale to the musicians?”), it mostly traces an upward trajectory of anger and paranoia, fueled by alcohol and made ever more alarming by the Spector arsenal. Whatever the circumstances surrounding the deadly firing of a gun in Ms. Clarkson’s mouth in the early hours of Feb. 3, 2003, Mr. Spector’s initial response is as telling as anything that may emerge from his trial. He felt annoyed. He felt put upon. He felt misunderstood. And he felt aggrieved. Ms. Clarkson, he said, had had absolutely no right to blow her head off inside his castle. (9 of 13) &#x00bb; Get early access to articles from this Sunday's Times. Sign up for TimesSelect free for 14 days. (9 of 13) &#x00bb; ON LESS THAN YOU THINK
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/arts/television/31watc.html?ex=1338264000&en=1fe9d92ad0517d19&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss The Starter Wife - Army Wives - TV Watch Climbing to Starting Over: A First Wife’s Lot didn’t bridge the divide between men and women, it broke the barriers separating best friends. A. Broben/USA Network Peter Jacobson, left, Debra Messing and Joe Mantegna in this new USA mini-series. In the Magazine: Gigi's Novel Life In a new reality show, Marla Maples, center, is counselor to Kevin, whose wife had an affair. Kim Delaney and Brian McNamara as husband and wife in this new Lifetime series. Betty Friedan made the suburbs safe for sisterhood. By the time “Sex and the City” rolled around, female bonding — especially over fancy cocktails — was as much a part of popular culture as fishing trips and fraternity hazing rites. The fact that nowadays women are allowed to like one another, even at the expense of men, is at the core of ladies-night hits like “Grey’s Anatomy.” So atavistic series like “The Bachelor” and “Desperate Housewives” that play down female camaraderie and instead showcase hissy fits and catfights have a naughty, contrarian tang. That retro allure is what drives tonight’s premiere of “The Starter Wife,” a USA mini-series that explores the plight of the discarded Hollywood socialite. It’s a satire-lite soufflé that follows all the steps of the chick-lit recipe. (If “Jane Eyre” were written according to today’s rules, the orphaned governess would be dragged to a bar by two female friends and a gay male pal and plied with mixed drinks and pool boys until she forgot all about Mr. Rochester and his mad starter wife.) (“Will & Grace”) plays Molly Kagan, whose studio mogul husband, Kenny (Peter Jacobson), tells her by cellphone that he wants a divorce. Based on a best-selling novel by Gigi Levangie Grazer, the wife of the Hollywood producer , a throwback to “The Women,” Clare Boothe Luce’s 1936 play about divorce among the rich and pampered. set in Malibu and Brentwood, not Park Avenue, so it’s also a lot like the 1940s radio show “Mary Noble, Backstage Wife” and the novels of Jackie Collins. These kinds of tell-all tales mix satirical flicks at the follies of the rich and famous (Kenny prepares their young daughter for school by saying, “Don’t forget to share your cookies with Violet Affleck”) with the voyeuristic spectacle of grown-up women channeling their inner Mean Girls. All soap operas centered on women include vixens and villainesses, so the difference lies mainly in the proportion. Molly Kagan has a few loyal female friends — and a gay decorator — but the juice of her tale comes from the snooty, gossiping frienemies who snub her in restaurants and kick her off charity committees when she loses her status as The Wife of. And the beauty of cable lies in the gradation of expectations. On premium networks like HBO or Showtime, seem trite and a little too obvious. On USA, it’s an escapist hoot. as a comic chaser to “Army Wives,” a more serious, and surprisingly engrossing, Lifetime series on Sunday about what happens to spouses left on base when their soldiers are deployed to combat zones (a lot). It’s a little like “The Unit,” the CBS drama about an elite team of commandos and their wives, but the focus of this Lifetime drama is on the women behind the men in uniform. “Army Wives,” which stars , examines women of varying age, rank and serial blunder who come together under the stress of military life — and the needling of a few bad women. Not all the bonding spouses are female, however. One member of the clique is an army psychiatrist whose wife returns from a two-year rotation in Afghanistan with a bad case of post-traumatic stress disorder. Female solidarity — or the lack of it — seems to be a popular theme this summer. ABC even ordered up a reality show, “Ex-Wives Club,” featuring Marla Maples, the former Mrs. ; Angie Everhart, who was once engaged to ; and Shar Jackson, who is the mother of two of Kevin Federline’s children and who lost him to . Those three professional exes lend their expertise to ordinary people who are suffering the pain of rejection. Their methods can be brutal. On the premiere, the scornees are sent to a life coach, Debbie Ford, who runs an emotional boot camp in Palm Springs, Calif. The schedule begins early: “8:00 a.m. — Anger.” But the founding members of “Ex-Wives Club” also offer empathy. Ms. Maples was careful in the first episode on Monday to speak well of her ex-husband, but at times she couldn’t resist a lateral dig. Ms. Maples helps Kevin, a would-be mortgage broker, organize a networking party in the real estate community. “I did this so many years with my ex-husband,” she replies when he thanks her. “And to be here with someone like you who appreciates it ...” Tearing up, she breaks off. Molly could use that kind of support. Instead, when Kenny dumps her for a sexy young pop singer named Shoshanna, Molly finds herself shunned by her fellow worshipers at what she calls the Church of Perpetual Upkeep. After losing her gym membership and even her coveted spot in a Mommy and Me class, she runs away. Not far, however. She retreats to the Malibu house of her oldest and hardest-drinking friend, Joan ( ), who has entered rehab. Lonely, Molly befriends the security guard, Lavender (Anika Noni Rose of “Dreamgirls”), who is preoccupied with college loans, not collagen. Molly’s decorator, Rodney (Chris Diamantopoulos), sticks by her, but Cricket (Miranda Otto) is torn. Her husband is a director of blockbuster comedies who wants Kenny’s studio to back a serious film, “The Dutch Bureaucrat’s Son,” and doesn’t want Kenny to think he and Cricket side with Molly. It doesn’t take long for Cricket to come to her senses. Molly’s senses are divided between the flirty overtures of her husband’s boss, Lou ( ), and a buff Malibu beach bum, Sam (Stephen Moyer). “Army Wives” is a street-smart homage to those who also serve because they stand and wait. not exactly groundbreaking social satire, but it’s a sassy look at those who stand behind their Hollywood men, and are waited upon by servants. REVIEW; The New Modern Woman, Ambitious and Feeble She Crashes the Boys' Club, Leaving Her Mark NBC News Drops Imus Show Over Racial Remark Imus Struggling To Retain Sway As a Franchise Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Op-Ed Contributor: Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Go, Eat, You Never Know Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Google Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq off Times delivery.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/movies/31loha.html Lindsay Lohan Lohan, a Mix of Sympathy and Scorn ANGELES, May 30 — It’s already fairly clear which image of will be most indelible in the summer of 2007, and it’s not a promotional still from her new movie, it’s a paparazzi photograph of this flame-haired actress passed out in a car in the wee hours of Sunday morning, sprawled across the passenger seat, her hair peeking out from a gray hooded sweatshirt, her mouth slack-jawed. That image shouted from the cover of tabloid newspapers on Monday as if to herald the umpteenth public wipeout for the 20-year-old actress, who was arrested here Saturday for driving under the influence after she crashed her Mercedes into a tree along the residential strip of Sunset Boulevard. On Monday she checked into a Malibu rehabilitation facility called Promises. And quick as a shot (no, not that kind), all of Hollywood was a-clatter with the sound of clucking tongues over advice not taken. So sad, everyone said, such a waste: so pretty, so talented — so uninsurable. Like too, the spectacle of a young woman’s self-destruction seemed to demand expressions of sympathy along with the requisite scorn. But hard reality was also quickly setting in. Across this close-knit town, decision makers were mentally wiping Ms. Lohan from their short lists. One studio chief who has worked with Ms. Lohan said that he would not hire her until she proved herself healthy and reliable. (Confident at least of this possibility, he would only comment anonymously.) “My hope for her would be that her growing pains get sorted out,” said Valerie Van Galder, president for marketing for Columbia Tristar. “The wild child used to be a phase you grew out of. This feels different. I think now there’s more attention to minutiae, and you’re stalked everywhere you go.” To be hired again, some said, Ms. Lohan might have to be more than sober. She would need perhaps to post her salary as bond, or pay for her own insurance, even on an independent film. Ms. Lohan was meant to start a new movie this week, an independent production titled about two female con artists, also starring . The film’s producers met on Wednesday to decide whether to replace Ms. Lohan or hold off while she spent a month under wraps. Many could say they saw this coming. Ms. Lohan has already worn out her welcome at Disney, where she made four films, including the hits “Parent Trap,” when she was a precocious 11-year-old, and in 2003, in which she played a thoroughly credible middle-aged mom. But by the time she starred in in 2005, she was already a paparazzi fixture, and Disney was worried enough to sit her down for a talking-to. “I told her before the movie began, ‘This is the moment in your career where you either become ,” recalled Nina Jacobson, who ran the studio at the time and is now a producer at DreamWorks. And while filming went fine, Ms. Lohan went missing during the international press junket in Europe. “The image issue aside, professionalism-wise we were disappointed,” Ms. Jacobson said. “And I was sad, because she’s so charismatic and appealing on screen. It’s a very sad thing to see it go to waste this way.” Those in Ms. Lohan’s camp find all this hand wringing to be disingenuous. One person close to Ms. Lohan pointed out that Disney handed the actress a $1 million bonus check for “Freaky Friday,” an invitation for her , then a 16-year-old, to indulge irresponsible impulses. And James G. Robinson, a producer of “Georgia Rule” who had a letter sent to Ms. Lohan at her Chateau Marmont hotel room last year calling her “a spoiled child” for failing to show up for her scheduled call times (the letter was conveniently leaked to the news media even as it was delivered), later invited the actress to be his date to a At Sony the hope was that Ms. Lohan would right herself, and soon. The studio has a thriller starring Ms. Lohan, “I Know Who Killed Me,” out in late July. Ms. Lohan’s publicist, Leslie Sloane-Zelnick, said her client intended to do the publicity for the film, but admitted that things were in limbo. “She will work for that film, she wants to work for that film,” Ms. Sloane-Zelnick said. “But we’re waiting on her situation, in general. At the end of the day, her talent will prevail. Someone will take a chance on her.” (1 of 35) REVIEW; Hey, California Girl, Don't Mess With Grandma FILM REVIEW; The Way We Were, Way Back in June of '68 A Big Star May Not a Profitable Movie Make FILM REVIEW; Altman's Casual Chaos Meets Keillor's Rhubarb-Tinged Nostalgia (1 of 35) &#x00bb; Seaver Autographed Baseball
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/arts/music/31roya.html Royal Opera House - Opus Arte - Music Opera Steps Into New Act: DVD Maker opera’s latest expansion into the world of video, the at Covent Garden in London said yesterday that it had bought a leading maker and producer of performance DVDs, Opus Arte. Garden’s purchase of a for-profit company is unheard of in the performing-arts world, although several orchestras have begun their own record labels. But the opera house’s chief executive, Tony Hall, said its success depends on developing a money-making arm and disseminating productions beyond the people sitting in the seats. “What this is about is buying content,” a telephone interview from London. “This gives us content that we intend to use for DVDs, high-definition DVDs, video on demand, TV channels, cinema relays — the works.” It is also “an extension of our brand,” he said. “We are trying to get more people globally to appreciate what’s going on at the Royal Opera House.” The house said it paid £5.7 million (about $11.3 million) to buy Opus Arte from its Dutch holding company, Opus Arte BV. The money came from a fund designated for capital and infrastructure projects. house was one of several bidders for Opus Arte, and not even the highest. He declined to identify the others. This latest foray into the digital realm is part of a wave of transformation in a traditionally live art form born 400 years ago in the courts of Europe. Increasingly opera houses around the world are putting their fare electronically on screens large and small to reach a bigger audience, make more money and garner greater notice in a media-soaked society. this season began simulcasting in movie theaters, selling 324,000 tickets. The Washington National Opera next year will simulcast on some college campuses. The is installing a high-definition video production center in the War Memorial Opera House, along with retractable screens hung from the ceiling. The Opéra National de Paris said it planned to negotiate with its unions to simulcast in movie theaters. Opera companies are offering downloads and streaming online, and providing outdoor projections. The trend has raised questions about what effects extensive video broadcasting will have on casting choices, on how people experience opera, on voices and on attendance. But opera executives, desperate to maintain audiences, have embraced the idea. Of the Royal Opera acquisition, Marc A. Scorca, president of Opera America, said: “It again demonstrates the close link between opera and today’s multimedia world. Opera is the traditional art form that translates most effectively to multimedia representation.” Opus Arte, based in East Sussex, England, produces video recordings of live opera productions, sometimes in conjunction with local networks, licenses them to broadcasters and distributes them on DVD. It has about 140 titles in its catalog, and it records at opera houses across Europe. It also produces dance performances. The Royal Opera House has about 40 recordings of its own opera and ballet productions. It said that Opus Arte would distribute those and future Royal Opera performances. The acquisition is expected to help the house expand into releases in movie theaters, on video-on-demand and on pay-per-view and through the Internet. Opus Arte also has a deal to provide programming for a soon-to-be announced satellite channel in Europe, Mr. Hall said. The channel will provide cultural fare in high definition. Arts Council England, which provides public money to the Royal Opera and other institutions, approved the deal. One British music critic questioned the wisdom of the house taking on a commercial venture with a large back catalog of performances by other companies. “I’m just slightly baffled by the whole thing,” said John Allison, editor of the British magazine Opera and a critic for The Sunday Telegraph. “I can see obviously how all opera houses like to plan for world domination, and maybe this is part of it.” More seriously he questioned whether Opus Arte’s new owners would promote the productions of other companies as much as their own, or whether the distributor’s profits would be significant. “It obviously gives them control over the distribution of their own performances,” he said. “Is it effectively going to become their own label?” Arte, which came burdened with nearly $4 million in debt, earned about $593,000 last year and would be charged with maintaining at least that level of income. “The money that we make will be gifted back to the mother ship,” Mr. Hall said. “We aim to get more out of it than that.” The Royal Opera will manage Opus Arte at “arm’s length,” he said. Compared with the Royal Opera’s $168 million budget, $593,000 is a tiny sum. About 30 percent of the house’s budget comes from government grants, 40 percent from ticket sales, 20 percent from fund-raising and 10 percent — or $16.8 million — from other commercial ventures like merchandising, catering and hall rentals. and promoting opera broadcasts from other houses, and selling Opus Arte’s back catalog, would be a major part of the DVD company’s activity. “We want to be able to build content from as many other opera houses as we can,” he said. “It’s fundamentally about our content and other people’s content, and how we use that through a whole variety of other media.” Janacek's 'Vixen' Captured On a Cunning Little Disc MUSIC; The Rush to Opera on DVD: Let's Not Get Carried Away RECORDINGS; With DVD's, A Box Seat On the Sofa DVD (Digital Versatile Disk) off Times delivery. NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: OPERA
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31funny.html?ex=1338264000&en=93ebcf1922421057&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss ANGELES — For , who commands up to $20 million for movies like “Anchorman” and “Blades of Glory,” starring in a short Web video may not seem like the best use of time. Ferrell as a destitute tenant facing an unlikely landlord in a modest but extremely popular short video. Screens: Mocking Stars and Beer Ads. Yawn. &#147;The Landlord&#148; took 45 minutes to shoot and cost little to produce. It appears on FunnyOrDie.com, where viewers leave their comments. But one afternoon in early March, Mr. Ferrell walked to a guest cottage at his Los Angeles home with a small crew that included Adam McKay, who is his production partner and the director of “Anchorman.” With a camcorder rolling, Mr. Ferrell improvised a sketch as a down-on-his-luck tenant being harassed by a foul-mouthed, booze-sodden landlord. The actor playing the landlord was Mr. McKay’s 2-year-old daughter, Pearl. “The Landlord,” which took 45 minutes to shoot and cost next to nothing to produce, was posted on the new Web site As of yesterday, the sketch had been viewed about 30 million times, and the newly posted outtakes have been watched more than 1.6 million times. (This being Hollywood, have already shot a sequel: “Good Cop, Baby Cop.”) Another punch line of the story, though, is that McKay started the site with the financial backing of Sequoia Capital, the Silicon Valley venture capital firm that made a name for itself, not to mention billions of dollars, by investing early in YouTube and The Internet, of course, is already filled with cheap laughs — YouTube alone offers a lifetime’s supply of home videos (some funny, most not). But now many experienced comedians, talent agents and financiers are seeing the Web as a way to showcase talent while trying to turn a profit. In January, for example, Turner Broadcasting began , which features videos created by comedy pros and amateurs. And last year, , bought a 51 percent stake in the parent company of for an estimated $20 million. Already, the seven-week-old FunnyOrDie.com, which highlights short videos by veteran comics like Mr. Ferrell as well as videos submitted by amateurs, is in discussions with potential advertisers. The actor and his colleagues have enlisted some famous friends to volunteer their services. , who is married to Chris Henchy, a writer and partner in FunnyOrDie.com, is a playground mom in one short video. And is planning to make a video, too, Mr. McKay said. Clients of Creative Artists Agency, which helped broker the deal with Sequoia, have also made short videos for the site — including the actor and comedian Ed Helms, who created a series of clips called “Zombie American,” and the boxer Oscar De La Hoya In an interview last week at his second-floor office on a side street along Hollywood Boulevard, Mr. Ferrell acknowledged that he had been ambivalent about the site at first. “But then we thought, ‘Maybe this could work,’ ” he said. “We are not putting so much pressure on every piece that it be perfect. Everything isn’t, ‘Oh my God! This has to be so funny.’ It’s amusing, observational. We’re trying not to make it so slick.” The pairing of Hollywood talent and Silicon Valley financiers has all the familiarity of a movie sequel. When the first Internet boom reached its peak in the late 1990s, many actors, writers and directors made the pilgrimage to the headquarters of the venture capital firms along Sand Hill Road in Menlo Park, Calif., to seek financing to create entertainment for the Internet. Many of those ventures failed, largely because traditional Web shows were expensive to create and the technology at the time made it cumbersome to watch videos online. Among those that faltered were Pop.com, Digital Entertainment Network and Icebox. Another cruel reality is that it is hard to be consistently funny, even with the help of deep pockets. Last summer, for example, Time Inc. closed its Web site, a satirical look at workplace issues, because it did not have a big enough audience. A big change from the late 1990s, though, is that there is now better technology to stream videos, and audiences seem more willing to watch them, leading many investors and Hollywood talent to see a new opportunity. “Our responsibility is to continue to make it better,” said a Sequoia partner, Mark D. Kvamme, referring to FunnyOrDie.com. “If it doesn’t succeed, it is our fault.” The idea for the site started with Mr. Kvamme, who approached Creative Artists in 2006 with his pitch to finance a site for experienced comics. “If you look at all the sites out there, a large portion of them have comedy,” he said, “but it is a mish-mash. There was no place that had a good smattering of professional videos and user-generated content.” Agents at Creative Artists introduced Mr. Kvamme to McKay last year. Then Mr. Kvamme visited the two men on the set of “Blades of Glory” to persuade them to join the new venture. McKay, who had worked together on “Saturday Night Live,” were reluctant at first. “I don’t really know much about the Internet,” Mr. Ferrell said. The reality of having to sit through three weekly meetings and spend hours reviewing videos and writing comments for the site also seemed daunting to them, not to mention a distraction from their more lucrative movie and television careers (the time they are devoting to FunnyOrDie.com is all sweat equity at this point, since they are not being paid). Even so, they came around to seeing the venture as an opportunity to experiment with their own material and to be exposed to ideas from other comics that they could later develop into television shows and movies. Once Mr. Ferrell started making short videos, he enjoyed it. “You get to exercise that same muscle you did at the show,” he said, referring to his days on “Saturday Night Live.” Mr. McKay also came up with the categories that voters use to rate their favorite videos — “immortal” if a video was great, “the crypt” if it was not. And while Mr. McKay and Mr. Ferrell review the 20 most popular videos posted, they also have been careful not to censor the site. When a user posted a video poking fun at , whom they know from “Saturday Night Live,” they briefly took it down, but posted it again because they did not want to set a precedent for banning videos that made fun of their friends. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (2 of 22) and the Internet Recordings and Downloads (Video) (2 of 22) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - TECHNOLOGY Where&#8217;s the Other Half of Your Music File? Take Note: Computing Takes Up Pen, Again Touch Screen in a Table Is the Latest Wrinkle in Computers Moving Web-Based Software Offline State of the Art: The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data Digital Fears Emerge After Data Siege in Estonia Swimmers Who Avoid the Deep Have a New Camcorder Choice For Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce In Fierce Competition, Google Finds Novel Ways to Feed Hiring Machine Camera Phone? Yahoo and Reuters Want You to Work for Their News Service The Future of Web Ads Is in Britain Red Web Sites Versus Blue Web Sites Taylor - 1985
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html Arts foreground, and behind it a &#147;house&#148; in &#147;Falling Stars,&#148; Anselm Kiefer&#146;s Since moving to France in 1993, Anselm Kiefer has turned his 50-acre property in Provence into a sprawling installation, with a former silk factory serving as his studio. Social Climbing to Starting Over: A First Wife’s Lot Female solidarity — or the lack of it — seems to be a popular theme on television this summer. Royal Opera Steps Into New Act: DVD Maker By DANIEL J. WAKIN Covent Garden’s purchase of a for-profit maker and producer of performance DVDs is unheard of in the performing-arts world. For Lohan, a Cocktail of Sympathy and Scorn Like Britney Spears before her, the spectacle of Lindsay Lohan’s self-destruction seemed to demand expressions of sympathy along with the requisite scorn. Books of the Times 'Tearing Reviewed by JANET MASLIN would feel like a crime story even if its subject, Phil Spector, were not currently on trial for murder. At this year's Spoleto Festival U.S.A., the presence of Gian Carlo Menotti is tangible. Go to Blog » LAURA M. HOLSON Many experienced comedians, talent agents and financiers see the Web as a way to showcase talent while trying to turn a profit. Mocking Stars and Beer Ads. Yawn. Music Review | Bill Charlap Trio Working Hard to Make the Old Numbers, Familiar and Otherwise, Sound New Pianist Bill Charlap, who performed with his trio at Dizzy’s Club Coca-Cola on Tuesday, seems less interested in stylistic eras of jazz than its ever-relevant ideal of melody and efficacy. Dance Review | Wally Cardona Quartet Toiling Hard on a Terrain of Paper and Particle Board By CLAUDIA LA ROCCO Wally Cardona and his dancers’ repetitive and seemingly pointless action was almost too much to watch at times, despite the articulate beauty of their movements. Compiled by LAWRENCE VAN GELDER Britney Spears ponders life after rehab, dance takes center stage at the Next Wave Festival and more culture news. Stories, Shaken and Stirred Concerts Found During the Intermission Music Review: Bebop in the Present Tense, Drummer in the Driver’s Seat Music Review | Puppini Sisters: A Trio Winks at the 1940s and Nods at Today’s Tunes Association to Promote Early Music (Better Late Than Never) Theater Review | 'Tea': Steeped in Female Bonding, Shared With a Troubled Ghost Bridge: It’s Time for Would-Be Champions to Get Their Signals Straight Scattered Stories, Shaken and Stirred Iran’s Giant Shoe Box of Faded Photographs, Full of the Unexpected Toiling Hard on a Terrain of Paper and Particle Board From Realm of Pure Dance to Enchanted Fairyland Life in the Sprawling Suburbs, if You Can Really Call It Living ‘Pirates’ Haul So Far Estimated at $401 Million Working Hard to Make the Old Numbers, Familiar and Otherwise, Sound New The Concerts Found Onstage While Everyone Else Takes a Break the Ensemble Studio Theater, the Show Must Go On from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 An appreciation of Charles Nelson Reilly, master thespian and gay icon. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts The Reclusive Mr. Polke New York, City of Grit and Glamour May 27 - June 2 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS Opera Steps Into New Act: DVD Maker Arts Space in Brooklyn to Get New Digs The Concerts Found Onstage While Everyone Else Takes a Break Art Review | Karen Kilimnik: Scattered Stories, Shaken and Stirred Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? Books of the Times: From Hitmaker to Defendant, a Review | 'Radiant City': Life in the Sprawling Suburbs, if You Can Really Call It Living Books of The Times: A Thousand Splendid Suns The TV Watch: Social Climbing to Starting Over: A First Wife&#8217;s Lot Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing Dad: Lindsay Hooked on OxyContin New 'Potter' to Open Sooner Than Planned Tribute Band Lookalikes Go Cutting Edge All Aboard For The Harry Potter Rollercoaster Mirren to Star In Gaza Drama Brosnan, Wife Helps Honolulu School Kids Avenue strollers - circa 1900 Get plays, TV and music at home. Get The Times delivered at 50% off. Which gadget is getting all the buzz? Looking for a job? What’s new on Broadway? Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. Find a world of reasons to go. Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/arts/design/31kief.html?ex=1338264000&en=cc09a0243f94285b&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss An foreground, and behind it a &#147;house&#148; in &#147;Falling Stars,&#148; Anselm Kiefer&#146;s show 31, 2007 PARIS, May 30 — Anselm Kiefer thinks big. Skip to next paragraph Looking at Anselm Kiefer Since moving to France in 1993, this German-born artist has turned his 50-acre property in Provence into a sprawling installation, with a former silk factory serving as his studio, and warehouses, greenhouses, towers and tunnels displaying his huge paintings and sculpturing the landscape. Now this same penchant for working on a monumental scale has made Mr. Kiefer the ideal artist to inaugurate an annual solo show — called, appropriately, Monumenta — that opened on Wednesday in the cavernous space of Paris. It continues through July 8. Mr. Kiefer, 62, whose specific exhibition is titled “Falling Stars,” will be followed next year by Richard Serra, the American sculptor of weighty shapes in sheet metal. Christian Boltanski, the French installation artist who often fills entire rooms with one work of art, has been chosen for 2009. Though the artists have the privilege — and challenge — of presenting their art in a unique setting, the show’s organizer, the French government, hopes to be the main beneficiary. Having recently completed a prolonged $135 million restoration of a vast, light-drenched glass and steel palace originally built for the 1900 Universal Exhibition here — the French Culture Ministry has been struggling to find a mission for the space, which is 150 feet wide, 660 feet long and 150 feet tall at its highest point. At the same time the government has been trying to kick-start public interest in contemporary art for several years now. Last year it sponsored “La Force de l’Art” (“The Strength of Art”), an exhibition of French-based artists But the show was poorly received, not least because the art was overwhelmed by the space. Monumenta, then, is designed both to show off to create a buzz around today’s new art. For Mr. Kiefer it also represents his grand debut in Paris. A soft-spoken and introspective man, he made his name in Germany and the United States in the 1970s and 1980s with large-format paintings and lead sculptures that stirred buried memories of the Holocaust and delved into the myths of Germany’s past. Britons discovered his art through an installation at the Royal Academy of Arts and a show at the White Cube Gallery in London. His work also features in the permanent collection of the Guggenheim Bilbao, in northwestern Spain, which, by coincidence, is holding a survey exhibition of his recent paintings through Sept. 3. But while Mr. Kiefer presented six 30-foot-high paintings in the chapel of the Hôpital de la Salpêtrière in 2000 and held a show at the Galerie Thaddaeus Ropac here last year, it is only now that the Parisian public is being introduced to the unusual work he has been developing at La Ribaute, his retreat outside Barjac in southern France. While “Falling Stars” includes new paintings, Mr. Kiefer has transferred some of La Ribaute to building seven stand-alone houses, or galleries, each some 50 feet high, and bringing three concrete towers that normally stand on his property. This installation has in turn had the desired effect of occupying the palace, both physically and visually. His show’s title is itself a reference to its glass roof. “We are beneath the sky, below the firmament,” he told reporters. Yet as much as with his constructions, Mr. Kiefer fills the space with the visual and intellectual force of his art, much of it inspired by literature, notably the poetry of the Romanian Paul Celan and the Austrian Ingeborg Bachmann, the Bible and cabalistic writings. Mr. Kiefer himself has often noted that in his youth he wavered between becoming a writer and a painter. No less distinctive are the materials he uses, with sunflowers, branches, pieces of cloth, terra cotta pottery, plaster, dried mud and lead objects often attached to thick layers of paint. Similarly he creates what he calls books with sheets of lead, some of which he rescued from Cologne Cathedral when its roof was being replaced some years ago. The show’s first house, “Land of Fog,” inspired by Bachmann’s poem of the same name, presents a single painting that suggests a sacrificial Aztec pyramid. At its foot lies a naked man — “It is me,” Mr. Kiefer said — below a large terra cotta heart attached to the painting. Anselm Kiefer’s “Falling Stars,” the first exhibition in the Monumenta series, runs through July 8 3 Avenue du Général Eisenhower, Paris; monumenta.com or 33 1 44-13-17-17. (1 of 9) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. of 9) &#x00bb; De Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: What I Think About Evolution Op-Ed Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Restaurants: Go, Eat, You Never Know Supreme Court Memo: Oral Dissents Give Ginsburg a New Voice on Court Comedy Business Turns to the Web Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Truth, Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Google Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity What I Think About Evolution Some Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/books/31masl.html From Hitmaker to Defendant, a of the Times From Hitmaker to Defendant, a Spector, the record producer, shown in 1975, is the subject of a new biography, &#8220;Tearing Down the Wall of Sound,&#8221; by Mick Brown, right. 31, 2007 In December 2002 the British journalist Mick Brown was driven by ’s chauffeur in Phil Spector’s white Rolls-Royce to Phil Spector’s gloomy castle in Alhambra, Calif., for a spooky interview with Phil Spector, who wore black silk pajamas and made a grand entrance to the strains of Handel. Skip to next paragraph TEARING DOWN THE WALL OF SOUND The Rise and Fall of Phil Spector Illustrated. 452 pages. Alfred A. Knopf. $26.95. Times Topics: Phil Spector Two months later Lana Clarkson, a tall blond actress who had starred in two “Barbarian Queen” movies and delivered the line “Hi” in “Fast Times at Ridgemont High,” died violently at the same house. The opening chapter of Mr. Brown’s Spector biography insinuates that the visiting interviewer might also have been in peril. But it was Mr. Spector, the tiny, Napoleonic, gun-toting rock ’n’ roll genius who was in jeopardy on that day. Mr. Brown was in the midst of compiling a seriously damning, though not even actively malevolent, set of stories about the Spector life and oeuvre. Grouped together in the bloodcurdling biography “Tearing Down the Wall of Sound,” they add up to a portrait of pure self-interest and cruelty, tempered only slightly by the great musical achievements of Mr. Spector’s golden age in the early 1960s. This book would feel like a crime story even if its subject were not currently on trial for Ms. Clarkson’s murder. Mr. Brown is not a muckraker. Nor is he really discovering anything new, at least not in the first half of Mr. Spector’s story. As many Spector acquaintances and scorched musical collaborators report, Mr. Spector’s autocratic nature was thought to have obvious sources. There was his father’s suicide (which led to the hit “To Know Him Is to Love Him,” with its title taken from Benjamin Spector’s gravestone). There were an overbearing mother and sister, Bertha and Shirley. There was also the possibility of inbreeding, since this rock maestro had both paternal and maternal grandfathers named George Spector and Phil’s parents were thought to be first cousins. There were the schoolyard bullies whose persecution supposedly explained the adult Phil Spector’s cadre of bodyguards. This first part of “Tearing Down the Wall of Sound,” after sketchily defining Mr. Spector’s pathology, is mostly devoted to explaining how the famous Wall of Sound was created. For those who know the musical history of this period, which has been expertly documented elsewhere, this part of the book holds little surprise beyond the elaborate skein of creative connections. Mr. Brown underscores the cause-and-effect links between certain recordings, like the Beach Boys’ “Don’t Worry Baby” with Mr. Spector’s production for the Ronettes, “Be My Baby,” or the Four Tops’ “Baby, I Need Your Loving” with the monster, Spector-produced Righteous Brothers hit, “You’ve Lost that Lovin’ Feeling.” He also explains the ubiquitousness of singers like Darlene Love, who might perform under different names at Mr. Spector’s whim and then wind up with nothing to show for it. The consensus expressed in the book is that Mr. Spector habitually betrayed and discarded musicians after he was through with them. “Rather than develop his artists’ careers,” Mr. Brown quotes the Atlantic Records pioneer Jerry Wexler as saying, “Phil developed himself.” But just as the Spector mystique was being hyperbolically immortalized by ’s 1964 magazine article “The First Tycoon of Teen” (which, as Mr. Brown points out, compares Mr. Spector with ), the Spector career hit a ceiling. This book maintains that Mr. Spector, unlike some of the artists he disparages (notably the Beach Boys’ Brian Wilson), began to stall as the world changed around him. “He was like a little boy who does something really cute and gets applauded for that,” says Bruce Johnston, the former Beach Boy, “and so he starts figuring out how to get the applause back, but then it’s not quite as cute again.” At this point the book begins to overflow with not-quite-as-cute effluvia. Borrowing from the sad, lurid memoir of Ronnie Spector, whose career with the Ronettes took a nosedive after she married her producer and disappeared under Mr. Spector’s possessive wing, it describes a lonely household that became a prison. Not for nothing was “Citizen Kane” Mr. Spector’s favorite film at the time. The Manson murders and the disastrous adoptions of three Spector children (later virtually abandoned by their father) only worsened the atmosphere of deterioration. In court testimony it was alleged that Ms. Spector drank to “shut out the continuous stream of shrieking by the respondent.” Said respondent would go on to pay Ms. Spector a court- ordered interim support payment of $1,250 in nickels. Professionally he grew to be “like Sherlock Holmes without a case.” His magisterial “Be My Baby” became background music in an advertisement for Cialis, the erectile dysfunction drug. And his attempted comebacks and collaborations (the most successful of which, in Mr. Brown’s opinion, being ’s “Imagine”) grew ever crazier. He famously aimed a gun at the neck of the singer and declared “Leonard, I love you,” prompting Mr. Cohen to reply drolly “I hope you do, Phil.” Working with Mr. Spector, says someone who attended their collaborative sessions, “gave Leonard a chance to perfect his Shaolin priesthood stuff and become one with the universe.” That was the degree of patience a Spector run-in required. While “Tearing Down the Wall of Sound,” with a title that perfectly describes its subject’s gift for self-destruction, does find those who appreciated Mr. Spector’s brilliance, humor and occasional wild generosity (“Phil, how can you give a thousand-dollar tip to the waiters but you won’t pay over scale to the musicians?”), it mostly traces an upward trajectory of anger and paranoia, fueled by alcohol and made ever more alarming by the Spector arsenal. Whatever the circumstances surrounding the deadly firing of a gun in Ms. Clarkson’s mouth in the early hours of Feb. 3, 2003, Mr. Spector’s initial response is as telling as anything that may emerge from his trial. He felt annoyed. He felt put upon. He felt misunderstood. And he felt aggrieved. Ms. Clarkson, he said, had had absolutely no right to blow her head off inside his castle. (9 of 13) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. of 13) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Sudoku Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/arts/television/31watc.html?ex=1338264000&en=1fe9d92ad0517d19&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss The Starter Wife - Army Wives - TV Watch - Climbing to Starting Over: A First Wife’s Lot 31, 2007 Feminism didn’t bridge the divide between men and women, it broke the barriers separating best friends. Skip to next paragraph Paul A. Broben/USA Network Peter Jacobson, left, Debra Messing and Joe Mantegna in this new USA mini-series. In the Magazine: Gigi's Novel Life In a new reality show, Marla Maples, center, is counselor to Kevin, whose wife had an affair. Kim Delaney and Brian McNamara as husband and wife in this new Lifetime series. Betty Friedan made the suburbs safe for sisterhood. By the time “Sex and the City” rolled around, female bonding — especially over fancy cocktails — was as much a part of popular culture as fishing trips and fraternity hazing rites. The fact that nowadays women are allowed to like one another, even at the expense of men, is at the core of ladies-night hits like “Grey’s Anatomy.” So atavistic series like “The Bachelor” and “Desperate Housewives” that play down female camaraderie and instead showcase hissy fits and catfights have a naughty, contrarian tang. That retro allure is what drives tonight’s premiere of “The Starter Wife,” a USA mini-series that explores the plight of the discarded Hollywood socialite. It’s a satire-lite soufflé that follows all the steps of the chick-lit recipe. (If “Jane Eyre” were written according to today’s rules, the orphaned governess would be dragged to a bar by two female friends and a gay male pal and plied with mixed drinks and pool boys until she forgot all about Mr. Rochester and his mad starter wife.) (“Will & Grace”) plays Molly Kagan, whose studio mogul husband, Kenny (Peter Jacobson), tells her by cellphone that he wants a divorce. Based on a best-selling novel by Gigi Levangie Grazer, the wife of the Hollywood producer , “The Starter Wife” is a throwback to “The Women,” Clare Boothe Luce’s 1936 play about divorce among the rich and pampered. “The Starter Wife” is set in Malibu and Brentwood, not Park Avenue, so it’s also a lot like the 1940s radio show “Mary Noble, Backstage Wife” and the novels of Jackie Collins. These kinds of tell-all tales mix satirical flicks at the follies of the rich and famous (Kenny prepares their young daughter for school by saying, “Don’t forget to share your cookies with Violet Affleck”) with the voyeuristic spectacle of grown-up women channeling their inner Mean Girls. All soap operas centered on women include vixens and villainesses, so the difference lies mainly in the proportion. Molly Kagan has a few loyal female friends — and a gay decorator — but the juice of her tale comes from the snooty, gossiping frienemies who snub her in restaurants and kick her off charity committees when she loses her status as The Wife of. And the beauty of cable lies in the gradation of expectations. On premium networks like HBO or Showtime, “The Starter Wife” would seem trite and a little too obvious. On USA, it’s an escapist hoot. “The Starter Wife” serves as a comic chaser to “Army Wives,” a more serious, and surprisingly engrossing, Lifetime series on Sunday about what happens to spouses left on base when their soldiers are deployed to combat zones (a lot). It’s a little like “The Unit,” the CBS drama about an elite team of commandos and their wives, but the focus of this Lifetime drama is on the women behind the men in uniform. “Army Wives,” which stars , examines women of varying age, rank and serial blunder who come together under the stress of military life — and the needling of a few bad women. Not all the bonding spouses are female, however. One member of the clique is an army psychiatrist whose wife returns from a two-year rotation in Afghanistan with a bad case of post-traumatic stress disorder. Female solidarity — or the lack of it — seems to be a popular theme this summer. ABC even ordered up a reality show, “Ex-Wives Club,” featuring Marla Maples, the former Mrs. ; Angie Everhart, who was once engaged to ; and Shar Jackson, who is the mother of two of Kevin Federline’s children and who lost him to . Those three professional exes lend their expertise to ordinary people who are suffering the pain of rejection. Their methods can be brutal. On the premiere, the scornees are sent to a life coach, Debbie Ford, who runs an emotional boot camp in Palm Springs, Calif. The schedule begins early: “8:00 a.m. — Anger.” But the founding members of “Ex-Wives Club” also offer empathy. Ms. Maples was careful in the first episode on Monday to speak well of her ex-husband, but at times she couldn’t resist a lateral dig. Ms. Maples helps Kevin, a would-be mortgage broker, organize a networking party in the real estate community. “I did this so many years with my ex-husband,” she replies when he thanks her. “And to be here with someone like you who appreciates it ...” Tearing up, she breaks off. Molly could use that kind of support. Instead, when Kenny dumps her for a sexy young pop singer named Shoshanna, Molly finds herself shunned by her fellow worshipers at what she calls the Church of Perpetual Upkeep. After losing her gym membership and even her coveted spot in a Mommy and Me class, she runs away. Not far, however. She retreats to the Malibu house of her oldest and hardest-drinking friend, Joan ( ), who has entered rehab. Lonely, Molly befriends the security guard, Lavender (Anika Noni Rose of “Dreamgirls”), who is preoccupied with college loans, not collagen. Molly’s decorator, Rodney (Chris Diamantopoulos), sticks by her, but Cricket (Miranda Otto) is torn. Her husband is a director of blockbuster comedies who wants Kenny’s studio to back a serious film, “The Dutch Bureaucrat’s Son,” and doesn’t want Kenny to think he and Cricket side with Molly. It doesn’t take long for Cricket to come to her senses. Molly’s senses are divided between the flirty overtures of her husband’s boss, Lou ( ), and a buff Malibu beach bum, Sam (Stephen Moyer). “Army Wives” is a street-smart homage to those who also serve because they stand and wait. “The Starter Wife” is not exactly groundbreaking social satire, but it’s a sassy look at those who stand behind their Hollywood men, and are waited upon by servants. (2 of 9) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. REVIEW; The New Modern Woman, Ambitious and Feeble She Crashes the Boys' Club, Leaving Her Mark NBC News Drops Imus Show Over Racial Remark Imus Struggling To Retain Sway As a Franchise (2 of 9) &#x00bb; De Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: What I Think About Evolution Op-Ed Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Restaurants: Go, Eat, You Never Know Supreme Court Memo: Oral Dissents Give Ginsburg a New Voice on Court Comedy Business Turns to the Web Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Truth, Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Push for Big Subsidies for Coal Process Google Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity What I Think About Evolution Some Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/movies/31loha.html Lindsay Lohan - Lohan, a Mix of Sympathy and Scorn 31, 2007 LOS ANGELES, May 30 — It’s already fairly clear which image of will be most indelible in the summer of 2007, and it’s not a promotional still from her new movie, Skip to next paragraph Instead it’s a paparazzi photograph of this flame-haired actress passed out in a car in the wee hours of Sunday morning, sprawled across the passenger seat, her hair peeking out from a gray hooded sweatshirt, her mouth slack-jawed. That image shouted from the cover of tabloid newspapers on Monday as if to herald the umpteenth public wipeout for the 20-year-old actress, who was arrested here Saturday for driving under the influence after she crashed her Mercedes into a tree along the residential strip of Sunset Boulevard. On Monday she checked into a Malibu rehabilitation facility called Promises. And quick as a shot (no, not that kind), all of Hollywood was a-clatter with the sound of clucking tongues over advice not taken. So sad, everyone said, such a waste: so pretty, so talented — so uninsurable. Like too, the spectacle of a young woman’s self-destruction seemed to demand expressions of sympathy along with the requisite scorn. But hard reality was also quickly setting in. Across this close-knit town, decision makers were mentally wiping Ms. Lohan from their short lists. One studio chief who has worked with Ms. Lohan said that he would not hire her until she proved herself healthy and reliable. (Confident at least of this possibility, he would only comment anonymously.) “My hope for her would be that her growing pains get sorted out,” said Valerie Van Galder, president for marketing for Columbia Tristar. “The wild child used to be a phase you grew out of. This feels different. I think now there’s more attention to minutiae, and you’re stalked everywhere you go.” To be hired again, some said, Ms. Lohan might have to be more than sober. She would need perhaps to post her salary as bond, or pay for her own insurance, even on an independent film. Ms. Lohan was meant to start a new movie this week, an independent production titled about two female con artists, also starring . The film’s producers met on Wednesday to decide whether to replace Ms. Lohan or hold off while she spent a month under wraps. Many could say they saw this coming. Ms. Lohan has already worn out her welcome at Disney, where she made four films, including the hits “Parent Trap,” when she was a precocious 11-year-old, and in 2003, in which she played a thoroughly credible middle-aged mom. But by the time she starred in in 2005, she was already a paparazzi fixture, and Disney was worried enough to sit her down for a talking-to. “I told her before the movie began, ‘This is the moment in your career where you either become ,” recalled Nina Jacobson, who ran the studio at the time and is now a producer at DreamWorks. And while filming went fine, Ms. Lohan went missing during the international press junket in Europe. “The image issue aside, professionalism-wise we were disappointed,” Ms. Jacobson said. “And I was sad, because she’s so charismatic and appealing on screen. It’s a very sad thing to see it go to waste this way.” Those in Ms. Lohan’s camp find all this hand wringing to be disingenuous. One person close to Ms. Lohan pointed out that Disney handed the actress a $1 million bonus check for “Freaky Friday,” an invitation for her , then a 16-year-old, to indulge irresponsible impulses. And James G. Robinson, a producer of “Georgia Rule” who had a letter sent to Ms. Lohan at her Chateau Marmont hotel room last year calling her “a spoiled child” for failing to show up for her scheduled call times (the letter was conveniently leaked to the news media even as it was delivered), later invited the actress to be his date to a At Sony the hope was that Ms. Lohan would right herself, and soon. The studio has a thriller starring Ms. Lohan, “I Know Who Killed Me,” out in late July. Ms. Lohan’s publicist, Leslie Sloane-Zelnick, said her client intended to do the publicity for the film, but admitted that things were in limbo. “She will work for that film, she wants to work for that film,” Ms. Sloane-Zelnick said. “But we’re waiting on her situation, in general. At the end of the day, her talent will prevail. Someone will take a chance on her.” (1 of 35) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. REVIEW; Hey, California Girl, Don't Mess With Grandma FILM REVIEW; The Way We Were, Way Back in June of '68 A Big Star May Not a Profitable Movie Make FILM REVIEW; Altman's Casual Chaos Meets Keillor's Rhubarb-Tinged Nostalgia (1 of 35) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Fifth Avenue From St. Regis, circa 1904 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/arts/music/31roya.html Royal Opera House - Opus Arte - Music - Opera Steps Into New Act: DVD Maker 31, 2007 In opera’s latest expansion into the world of video, the at Covent Garden in London said yesterday that it had bought a leading maker and producer of performance DVDs, Opus Arte. Skip to next paragraph Covent Garden’s purchase of a for-profit company is unheard of in the performing-arts world, although several orchestras have begun their own record labels. But the opera house’s chief executive, Tony Hall, said its success depends on developing a money-making arm and disseminating productions beyond the people sitting in the seats. “What this is about is buying content,” Mr. Hall said in a telephone interview from London. “This gives us content that we intend to use for DVDs, high-definition DVDs, video on demand, TV channels, cinema relays — the works.” It is also “an extension of our brand,” he said. “We are trying to get more people globally to appreciate what’s going on at the Royal Opera House.” The house said it paid £5.7 million (about $11.3 million) to buy Opus Arte from its Dutch holding company, Opus Arte BV. The money came from a fund designated for capital and infrastructure projects. Mr. Hall said the house was one of several bidders for Opus Arte, and not even the highest. He declined to identify the others. This latest foray into the digital realm is part of a wave of transformation in a traditionally live art form born 400 years ago in the courts of Europe. Increasingly opera houses around the world are putting their fare electronically on screens large and small to reach a bigger audience, make more money and garner greater notice in a media-soaked society. this season began simulcasting in movie theaters, selling 324,000 tickets. The Washington National Opera next year will simulcast on some college campuses. The is installing a high-definition video production center in the War Memorial Opera House, along with retractable screens hung from the ceiling. The Opéra National de Paris said it planned to negotiate with its unions to simulcast in movie theaters. Opera companies are offering downloads and streaming online, and providing outdoor projections. The trend has raised questions about what effects extensive video broadcasting will have on casting choices, on how people experience opera, on voices and on attendance. But opera executives, desperate to maintain audiences, have embraced the idea. Of the Royal Opera acquisition, Marc A. Scorca, president of Opera America, said: “It again demonstrates the close link between opera and today’s multimedia world. Opera is the traditional art form that translates most effectively to multimedia representation.” Opus Arte, based in East Sussex, England, produces video recordings of live opera productions, sometimes in conjunction with local networks, licenses them to broadcasters and distributes them on DVD. It has about 140 titles in its catalog, and it records at opera houses across Europe. It also produces dance performances. The Royal Opera House has about 40 recordings of its own opera and ballet productions. It said that Opus Arte would distribute those and future Royal Opera performances. The acquisition is expected to help the house expand into releases in movie theaters, on video-on-demand and on pay-per-view and through the Internet. Opus Arte also has a deal to provide programming for a soon-to-be announced satellite channel in Europe, Mr. Hall said. The channel will provide cultural fare in high definition. Arts Council England, which provides public money to the Royal Opera and other institutions, approved the deal. One British music critic questioned the wisdom of the house taking on a commercial venture with a large back catalog of performances by other companies. “I’m just slightly baffled by the whole thing,” said John Allison, editor of the British magazine Opera and a critic for The Sunday Telegraph. “I can see obviously how all opera houses like to plan for world domination, and maybe this is part of it.” More seriously he questioned whether Opus Arte’s new owners would promote the productions of other companies as much as their own, or whether the distributor’s profits would be significant. “It obviously gives them control over the distribution of their own performances,” he said. “Is it effectively going to become their own label?” Mr. Hall said Opus Arte, which came burdened with nearly $4 million in debt, earned about $593,000 last year and would be charged with maintaining at least that level of income. “The money that we make will be gifted back to the mother ship,” Mr. Hall said. “We aim to get more out of it than that.” The Royal Opera will manage Opus Arte at “arm’s length,” he said. Compared with the Royal Opera’s $168 million budget, $593,000 is a tiny sum. About 30 percent of the house’s budget comes from government grants, 40 percent from ticket sales, 20 percent from fund-raising and 10 percent — or $16.8 million — from other commercial ventures like merchandising, catering and hall rentals. Mr. Hall said producing and promoting opera broadcasts from other houses, and selling Opus Arte’s back catalog, would be a major part of the DVD company’s activity. “We want to be able to build content from as many other opera houses as we can,” he said. “It’s fundamentally about our content and other people’s content, and how we use that through a whole variety of other media.” (3 of 9) &#x00bb; Want to save this article?  Download the Times File Toolbar - get it now with TimesSelect. Janacek's 'Vixen' Captured On a Cunning Little Disc MUSIC; The Rush to Opera on DVD: Let's Not Get Carried Away RECORDINGS; With DVD's, A Box Seat On the Sofa DVD (Digital Versatile Disk) (3 of 9) &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands 50% off Times delivery. NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: OPERA Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/technology/31funny.html?ex=1338264000&en=93ebcf1922421057&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Comedy Business Turns to the Web - Business Turns to the Web 31, 2007 LOS ANGELES — For , who commands up to $20 million for movies like “Anchorman” and “Blades of Glory,” starring in a short Web video may not seem like the best use of time. Skip to next paragraph Will Ferrell as a destitute tenant facing an unlikely landlord in a modest but extremely popular short video. Screens: Mocking Stars and Beer Ads. Yawn. &#147;The Landlord&#148; took 45 minutes to shoot and cost little to produce. It appears on FunnyOrDie.com, where viewers leave their comments. But one afternoon in early March, Mr. Ferrell walked to a guest cottage at his Los Angeles home with a small crew that included Adam McKay, who is his production partner and the director of “Anchorman.” With a camcorder rolling, Mr. Ferrell improvised a sketch as a down-on-his-luck tenant being harassed by a foul-mouthed, booze-sodden landlord. The actor playing the landlord was Mr. McKay’s 2-year-old daughter, Pearl. “The Landlord,” which took 45 minutes to shoot and cost next to nothing to produce, was posted on the new Web site As of yesterday, the sketch had been viewed about 30 million times, and the newly posted outtakes have been watched more than 1.6 million times. (This being Hollywood, Mr. Ferrell and Pearl have already shot a sequel: “Good Cop, Baby Cop.”) Another punch line of the story, though, is that Mr. Ferrell and Mr. McKay started the site with the financial backing of Sequoia Capital, the Silicon Valley venture capital firm that made a name for itself, not to mention billions of dollars, by investing early in YouTube and The Internet, of course, is already filled with cheap laughs — YouTube alone offers a lifetime’s supply of home videos (some funny, most not). But now many experienced comedians, talent agents and financiers are seeing the Web as a way to showcase talent while trying to turn a profit. In January, for example, Turner Broadcasting began , which features videos created by comedy pros and amateurs. And last year, , bought a 51 percent stake in the parent company of for an estimated $20 million. Already, the seven-week-old FunnyOrDie.com, which highlights short videos by veteran comics like Mr. Ferrell as well as videos submitted by amateurs, is in discussions with potential advertisers. The actor and his colleagues have enlisted some famous friends to volunteer their services. , who is married to Chris Henchy, a writer and partner in FunnyOrDie.com, is a playground mom in one short video. And is planning to make a video, too, Mr. McKay said. Clients of Creative Artists Agency, which helped broker the deal with Sequoia, have also made short videos for the site — including the actor and comedian Ed Helms, who created a series of clips called “Zombie American,” and the boxer Oscar De La Hoya In an interview last week at his second-floor office on a side street along Hollywood Boulevard, Mr. Ferrell acknowledged that he had been ambivalent about the site at first. “But then we thought, ‘Maybe this could work,’ ” he said. “We are not putting so much pressure on every piece that it be perfect. Everything isn’t, ‘Oh my God! This has to be so funny.’ It’s amusing, observational. We’re trying not to make it so slick.” The pairing of Hollywood talent and Silicon Valley financiers has all the familiarity of a movie sequel. When the first Internet boom reached its peak in the late 1990s, many actors, writers and directors made the pilgrimage to the headquarters of the venture capital firms along Sand Hill Road in Menlo Park, Calif., to seek financing to create entertainment for the Internet. Many of those ventures failed, largely because traditional Web shows were expensive to create and the technology at the time made it cumbersome to watch videos online. Among those that faltered were Pop.com, Digital Entertainment Network and Icebox. Another cruel reality is that it is hard to be consistently funny, even with the help of deep pockets. Last summer, for example, Time Inc. closed its Web site, a satirical look at workplace issues, because it did not have a big enough audience. A big change from the late 1990s, though, is that there is now better technology to stream videos, and audiences seem more willing to watch them, leading many investors and Hollywood talent to see a new opportunity. “Our responsibility is to continue to make it better,” said a Sequoia partner, Mark D. Kvamme, referring to FunnyOrDie.com. “If it doesn’t succeed, it is our fault.” The idea for the site started with Mr. Kvamme, who approached Creative Artists in 2006 with his pitch to finance a site for experienced comics. “If you look at all the sites out there, a large portion of them have comedy,” he said, “but it is a mish-mash. There was no place that had a good smattering of professional videos and user-generated content.” Agents at Creative Artists introduced Mr. Kvamme to Mr. Ferrell and Mr. McKay last year. Then Mr. Kvamme visited the two men on the set of “Blades of Glory” to persuade them to join the new venture. Mr. Ferrell and Mr. McKay, who had worked together on “Saturday Night Live,” were reluctant at first. “I don’t really know much about the Internet,” Mr. Ferrell said. The reality of having to sit through three weekly meetings and spend hours reviewing videos and writing comments for the site also seemed daunting to them, not to mention a distraction from their more lucrative movie and television careers (the time they are devoting to FunnyOrDie.com is all sweat equity at this point, since they are not being paid). Even so, they came around to seeing the venture as an opportunity to experiment with their own material and to be exposed to ideas from other comics that they could later develop into television shows and movies. Once Mr. Ferrell started making short videos, he enjoyed it. “You get to exercise that same muscle you did at the show,” he said, referring to his days on “Saturday Night Live.” Mr. McKay also came up with the categories that voters use to rate their favorite videos — “immortal” if a video was great, “the crypt” if it was not. And while Mr. McKay and Mr. Ferrell review the 20 most popular videos posted, they also have been careful not to censor the site. When a user posted a video poking fun at , whom they know from “Saturday Night Live,” they briefly took it down, but posted it again because they did not want to set a precedent for banning videos that made fun of their friends. Sphere: Related Blogs & Articles (2 of 22) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. and the Internet Recordings and Downloads (Video) (2 of 22) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - TECHNOLOGY Comedy Business Turns to the Web Basics: Where&#8217;s the Other Half of Your Music File? Take Note: Computing Takes Up Pen, Again Moving Web-Based Software Offline State of the Art: The Cartridge, Updated, Catches Up to Data Touch Screen in a Table Is the Latest Wrinkle in Computers For Jobs and Gates, a Night to Reminisce Digital Fears Emerge After Data Siege in Estonia Swimmers Who Avoid the Deep Have a New Camcorder Choice Silicon Valley Wide-Eyed Over a Bride Camera Phone? Yahoo and Reuters Want You to Work for Their News Service The Future of Web Ads Is in Britain Red Web Sites Versus Blue Web Sites million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Elizabeth Taylor - 1985 Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html Arts - foreground, and behind it a &#147;house&#148; in &#147;Falling Stars,&#148; Anselm Kiefer&#146;s show Anselm Kiefer, who has a penchant for working on a monumental scale, inaugurates an annual solo show in the cavernous space of Paris. Social Climbing to Starting Over: A First Wife’s Lot Female solidarity — or the lack of it — seems to be a popular theme on television this summer. Royal Opera Steps Into New Act: DVD Maker By DANIEL J. WAKIN Covent Garden’s purchase of a for-profit maker and producer of performance DVDs is unheard of in the performing-arts world. For Lohan, a Mix of Sympathy and Scorn Like Britney Spears before her, the spectacle of Lindsay Lohan’s self-destruction seemed to demand expressions of sympathy along with the requisite scorn. Books of the Times 'Tearing Down the Wall of Sound' Reviewed by JANET MASLIN “Tearing Down the Wall of Sound” would feel like a crime story even if its subject, Phil Spector, were not currently on trial for murder. At this year's Spoleto Festival U.S.A., the presence of Gian Carlo Menotti is tangible. Go to Blog » Comedy Business Turns to the Web By LAURA M. HOLSON A video with Will Ferrell has become a sensation on a Web site that has the backing of a major venture capital firm. Mocking Stars and Beer Ads. Yawn. Music Review | Bill Charlap Trio Working Hard to Make the Old Numbers, Familiar and Otherwise, Sound New Pianist Bill Charlap, who performed with his trio at Dizzy’s Club Coca-Cola on Tuesday, seems less interested in stylistic eras of jazz than its ever-relevant ideal of melody and efficacy. Dance Review | Wally Cardona Quartet Toiling Hard on a Terrain of Paper and Particle Board By CLAUDIA LA ROCCO Wally Cardona and his dancers’ repetitive and seemingly pointless action was almost too much to watch at times, despite the articulate beauty of their movements. Compiled by LAWRENCE VAN GELDER Britney Spears ponders life after rehab, dance takes center stage at the Next Wave Festival and more culture news. Art & Design &#x00bb; Scattered Stories, Shaken and Stirred Concerts Found During the Intermission Music Review: Bebop in the Present Tense, Drummer in the Driver’s Seat Music Review | Puppini Sisters: A Trio Winks at the 1940s and Nods at Today’s Tunes Association to Promote Early Music (Better Late Than Never) Theater Review | 'Tea': Steeped in Female Bonding, Shared With a Troubled Ghost Bridge: It’s Time for Would-Be Champions to Get Their Signals Straight Scattered Stories, Shaken and Stirred Iran’s Giant Shoe Box of Faded Photographs, Full of the Unexpected Toiling Hard on a Terrain of Paper and Particle Board From Realm of Pure Dance to Enchanted Fairyland Life in the Sprawling Suburbs, if You Can Really Call It Living ‘Pirates’ Haul So Far Estimated at $401 Million Working Hard to Make the Old Numbers, Familiar and Otherwise, Sound New The Concerts Found Onstage While Everyone Else Takes a Break Comedy Business Turns to the Web At the Ensemble Studio Theater, the Show Must Go On from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 A brief examination of the money-comedy nexus in the world of Web video. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts The Reclusive Mr. Polke New York, City of Grit and Glamour May 27 - June 2 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS An Opera Steps Into New Act: DVD Maker The Concerts Found Onstage While Everyone Else Takes a Break Arts Space in Brooklyn to Get New Digs Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? Art Review | Karen Kilimnik: Scattered Stories, Shaken and Stirred Books of the Times: From Hitmaker to Defendant, a TV Watch: Social Climbing to Starting Over: A First Wife&#8217;s Lot Movie Review | 'Radiant City': Life in the Sprawling Suburbs, if You Can Really Call It Living Books of The Times: A Thousand Splendid Suns Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing Of Mexican Screen Legend Maria Felix on Sale Organ Donor TV Show Triggers Condemnation Lohan's Dad: Lindsay Hooked on OxyContin Harry Potter Theme Park Headed to Fla. Richie Fears She May Go to Jail Too New 'Potter' to Open Sooner Than Planned $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands NYT LARGE-PRINT CROSSWORD PUZZLE OMNIBUS VOLUME 7 Get plays, TV and music at home. Get The Times delivered at 50% off. What’s new on Broadway? Plan what to see, eat and do. Buy, sell or research a car. Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week. Continuous coverage of business news. Browse movie reviews from 1913.
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/arts/music/04rema.html Rock Bottom Remainders - Books - on, but Hang on to Your Literary Gigs Julien Jourdes for The Rock Bottom Remainders: front row from left, Kathi Kamen Goldmark, Amy Tan, Lesley Gore, Greg Iles, Stephen King, Roger McGuinn, Sam Barry, Scott Turow, Ridley Pearson and Dave Barry. 4, 2007 What kind of rock band gets up before noon? For that matter, what kind of band reads and writes? The Rock Bottom Remainders do both, and have also been known, while on tour, to tune in to “The NewsHour With Jim Lehrer.” At a little after 6 on Thursday morning they turned up at the studio of “Good Morning America” to do a promotional spot for a Friday-night benefit coinciding with BookExpo America, the big publishing fair that took place in New York over the weekend. The green-room spread included, instead of greenies and quarts of Jack, platters of fresh fruit and, at the request of Roy Blount Jr., one of the band’s founding members, a big pan of grits. Remainders is a booksellers’ term, used for books that languish on the shelves so long they have to be dumped at a discount. Most of the members of the band inhabit a different part of the literary universe, the loftier reaches of the best-seller list. Besides Mr. Blount, members include Amy Tan, Dave Barry, Ridley Pearson, , Scott Turow and Mitch Albom. At least notionally Maya Angelou is also a member, but she has yet to show up for a gig — a word that members of the Rock Bottom Remainders delight in using whenever possible. The band was created in 1992 by Kathi Kamen Goldmark, a singer and musician who was working part time as a media escort in Los Angeles, driving authors around on their book tours. “When they heard I sang in a band, that’s all many of them wanted to talk about,” she recalled on Thursday. “They’d say: ‘You’re kidding. You’re so lucky!’ ” She came up with the idea of putting together a literary band to give a benefit concert at a Los Angeles book fair that year and sent out a dozen or so faxes. Those who responded became the Rock Bottom Remainders, and with a few additions the band has been together ever since. They are what every garage band dreams of becoming: a bunch of middle-aged people with word-processing day jobs who every now and then get to go on tour, not in a rented van but in Aretha Franklin’s old bus. They have played benefit concerts all over the country, before live, paying audiences, and even have groupies. A few years ago the bus broke down late at night in Alabama, Mr. Barry recalled, and out of the darkness a fan suddenly materialized with a copy of “The Stand” that he wanted Mr. King to autograph. In Nashville once another King fan was so carried away that she lit all 10 of her fingernails on fire. “What we all gain from this is just the friendships, the hanging out,” Mr. Barry explained. “There’s no other group of people I spend this much time with. Writing is a pretty solitary activity to begin with, and, you know, once you get to be a certain age, once the kids are grown up, you just don’t make that many new friends. But it’s really intense here. It’s like camp for grown-ups.” Ms. Tan said, “I’d the whales to do this.” In the beginning, by all accounts, the band was pretty awful, and over the years the members have memorized a great deal of self-deprecating patter. “We play music about as well as Metallica writes novels,” Mr. Barry likes to say. Mr. Turow says, “We’re a band that specializes in meeting low expectations.” And Mr. Blount characterizes the Remainders’ particular brand of music as “hard listening.” He should know. Easily the most sonically challenged member of the band, he has a voice so bad and pitch so uncertain that he is usually discouraged from singing at all, except during the chorus of “Wild Thing,” when he is allowed to solo on the “You move me” part. In truth the Rock Bottom Remainders are not terrible, and harbor a certain amount of genuine talent. Mr. Pearson was a professional musician before turning to writing; Mr. Barry played in a college rock band, Federal Duck. Stars like and Warren Zevon have occasionally made guest appearances, and over time the band has carefully added some ringers: the nonfiction author James McBride, for example, who still works as a professional saxophonist, and the novelist Greg Isles, who for years played in the band Frankly Scarlet. A key acquisition was Mr. Albom, the sports columnist, who in 1994 replaced Barbara Kingsolver (who had left to have children) at the keyboard and as a bonus brought along his wife, Janine Sabino, a professional singer. Before becoming a writer, Mr. Albom recalled at the “Good Morning America” studio, he played the piano for a living. “I used to play in an Irish bar about 30 blocks from here,” he said. “It was called McSomething’s, and it used to be just me and the drunks. I’d get about $10 a night. Now look at me. I’m in a band where they have people to carry our stuff for you.” On Friday night, just before the band’s benefit concert at Webster Hall, Mr. King ducked into a bathroom to slick his hair back into a ducktail. Mr. King, who sings and plays rhythm guitar, confessed that he had been practicing at home for weeks. “Dave and Ridley and Greg take this very seriously,” he said. “It’s like watching three type-A people prepare for the G.R.E.’s. I’m just a hood ornament on this band, but all the same you don’t want to make a fool of yourself. There’s always that fear of failure.” As it turned out, Mr. Barry and Mr. Pearson, who are in effect the band’s co-leaders, had prepared so carefully that when the group’s members came onstage, they found on their music stands not just a playlist but also a list of the chord changes they would need for some new songs they were trying out. “We have about 70 or 80 songs we can do,” Mr. Pearson said. “But all of them use the same chords.” The evening featured guest appearances by , Andy Borowitz and Leslie Gore, who belted out her ’60s anthem “It’s My Party” and was so pumped she stayed onstage for the rest of the evening, dancing and vamping. Halfway through, the Rock and Roll Hall of Famer Roger McGuinn came out, transcendently cool in black pants, black shirt and black fedora, and over the course of a couple of Byrds songs lifted the band way off rock bottom. For a while it wasn’t just not bad — it was pretty good. For the rest of the time it rocked at least, and even wailed during a couple of harmonica solos by Mr. Barry’s younger brother Sam, who is not an author, strictly speaking, but close enough. (He works for a division of HarperCollins.) There was no fingernail ignition, but the audience swayed, danced and took countless cellphone pictures. Near the end Mr. Albom did an impersonation, appearing first in a wig, sunglasses and gold lamé jacket and then, for “Jailhouse Rock,” stripping down to a sleeveless undershirt and striped prison pants. Then Larry Portzline, of Harrisburg, Pa., who had paid $2,800 at a charity auction for the privilege, joined the band to sing “Wild Thing.” Afterward he was still wired. “I can’t believe it,” he said. “I even got to rehearse with them. But I wasn’t worried. I’ve known ‘Wild Thing’ all my life.” Packing up, Mr. King said, “You never know for certain, but I’m pretty sure we never sounded better.” (3 of 8) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. Way Home: A 'Rough South' Lion Honored in His Old Lair THEATER; The Music Is Sweet, The Words Are True Houses and Souls, Haunted by Holocaust Ghosts (3 of 8) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Forever Fab Beatles Commemorative Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/books/04book1.html?ex=1338609600&en=89b26b8069e0c8d9&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss BookExpo America - Column - Philosophical, Booksellers Face the Digital 4, 2007 would not be pleased. Skip to next paragraph Nicole Bengiveno/The and Microsoft had large presences at BookExpo America. At the Book Expo With Khaled Hosseini A year ago that literary lion elicited a standing ovation in a banquet hall full of booksellers when he exhorted them to “defend your lonely forts” against a digital future of free book downloads and snippets of text. But this year, at BookExpo America, the publishing industry’s annual convention that ended yesterday, the battering ram of technology was back. Chris Anderson, the editor of Wired magazine who made his own splash last year with his book “The Long Tail: Why the Future of Business is Selling Less of More,” returned to the convention to talk about the possibility of giving away online his next book — which he fittingly intends to title “Free” — to readers who were willing to read it with advertisements interspersed throughout its pages. (He still intends to sell the book traditionally to readers who’d rather get their text without the ads.) both had large presences at the expo at the Jacob K. Javits Convention Center in New York, where about 35,000 publishers, booksellers, authors, agents and librarians attended the four-day carnival of promotion for the all-important fall lineup of titles. A panel sponsored by MySpace.com, the social networking site, drew a standing-room-only crowd, as did another discussion on the influence of literary blogs. Vendors offering to digitize books proliferated. There were also the usual flashy parties, giveaways and autograph signings at the convention, which is not open to the public. Celebrities sold out $35-a-head breakfasts and lunches ( all had books to hawk), and impersonators stalked the exhibition hall. ( , Borat and a twinkling star who could be mistaken for a banana with arms were all sighted.) And publishers and booksellers attempted to figure out the Next Great Book (popular galleys included Denis Johnson’s “Tree of Smoke,” Alice Sebold’s “The Almost Moon” and “Loving Frank,” a debut novel by Nancy Horan.) But in what has become another rite of the BookExpo in recent years, the industry continued to grapple with its evolving techno-future with a mixture of enthusiasm, anxiety and a whiff of desperation. “I think there is going to be a lot of sturm and drang before we figure this out,” said Eamon Dolan, editor in chief of Houghton Mifflin. “There is a huge undertaking ahead. It is going to be rocky.” Many of the independent booksellers, who have been buffeted by technological change for years, seemed quite philosophical about the need to move forward. Clark Kepler, president of Kepler’s Books and Magazines, an independent store in Menlo Park, Calif., visited a booth for a company that scans books and digitizes them, a technology that, on the face of it, would seem incompatible with a physical bookstore’s mission. “In terms of the traditional bookstore it would not be good for us,” acknowledged Mr. Kepler, whose store closed its doors nearly two years ago because of financial problems set off in part by fierce competition from online retailers like . He was able to reopen shortly afterward when venture capitalists from Silicon Valley and other community members invested in the store. “But ultimately I think it is good for all of us as readers and seekers of knowledge to have that information available, so as a bookseller I need to rethink my position instead of saying, ‘I wish the world would stand still,’ ” he said. In a pavilion outside the main exhibit hall Jason Epstein, the former editorial director of Random House and the creator of the Anchor Books paperback imprint, and Dane Neller, founders of , demonstrated their Espresso Book Machine, which can print a small paperback book on site in less than five minutes. “This could replace the entire supply chain that has been in existence since Gutenberg,” Mr. Epstein said. Chris Morrow, whose parents founded Northshire Bookstore in Manchester Center, Vt., three decades ago, said he would be installing one of the machines. He said he planned to print local histories and Northshire-brand titles from the public domain, like “Middlemarch” or “Moby-Dick.” “There are lots of challenges in bricks-and-mortar book selling, and I see this as a way of expanding our business,” Mr. Morrow said. The idea that technology could enlarge, rather than replace, existing sales intrigued David Shanks, chief executive of Penguin Group (USA). “There are millions of gadgets out there where we could sell a lot of product digitally,” said Mr. Shanks, before turning his attention to the keynote address by , the former Federal Reserve chairman, who appeared with his wife, the NBC correspondent Andrea Mitchell, to promote Mr. Greenspan’s forthcoming memoir, “The Age of Turbulence.” (Penguin is hoping to sell a lot of copies of the book — in whatever form — to recover the $8.5 million advance it is paying Mr. Greenspan.) Other uses of technology provoked unease. At a dinner party given by Alfred A. Knopf for some of its authors, Vivien Jennings, president of Rainy Day Books in Fairway, Kan., railed against authors who link from their Web pages to or even sell autographed copies of their books directly to consumers. “We host a lot of book signings,” Ms. Jennings said. Authors who sell their own books “are particularly hurtful to us.” , the former editor of both The New Yorker and Vanity Fair, who appeared at a lunch at the Modern to promote “The Diana Chronicles,” Ms. Brown’s book about Diana, Princess of Wales , was more concerned about the possibility that authors’ work could be offered free online. “Giving an author’s book away for nothing on the Web as a way to market books seems a mirage to me,” Ms. Brown wrote in an e-mail message after the lunch. “All it does is feed the hungry angles of journalists and bloggers who plunder it without any of the author’s context or nuance and makes the reader feel there is nothing new to learn from the genuine article when it finally limps on its weary way to a book shop.” Although “The Diana Chronicles” will be excerpted in Vanity Fair, Ms. Brown pointed out that both the author and publisher are generally paid for such excerpts. Back in the aisles of the exhibition floor Deal Safrit, a wiry bookseller from Salisbury, N.C., boasted of a well-worn method for coping with technological developments. “I don’t spend a lot of time worrying about it,” he said. “We just do what we can do well. We are determined to sell books that we think people should read.” (7 of 9) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. Barely Up, Book Trade Yearns for Next Blockbuster Pushing a New Writer Upstream; An Unknown Author, An Ambitious Publisher And Hopes of Big Sales Favorite Author Not on Tour? See the Movie Computers and the Internet Retail Stores and Trade (7 of 9) &#x00bb; When Should a Kid Start Kindergarten? Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear The Other Machu Picchu Surge in Adoptions Raises Concern in Ethiopia 36 Hours in Florence Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? Editorial: Dick Cheney Rules Choice Tables | Barcelona: Five Catalan Stars, With Small Plates and Long Menus The Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Fingers That Keep the Most Treasured Violins Fit Say Push in Baghdad Is Short of Goal For Pornographers, Internet's Virtues Turn to Vices Papers Portray Plot as More Talk Than Action Iraq's Curse: A Thirst for Final, Crushing Victory Fever Builds for iPhone (Anxiety Too) Bush's Push on Immigration Tests His Base The Democrats' Second 2008 Presidential Debate 4 Accused of Plot to Blow Up Facilities at Kennedy Airport U.S. Not Pushing for Attack on Iran, Rice Says the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/arts/dance/04slee.html Wake Up, Princess, the Movies Are Calling - Review | 'The Sleeping Beauty' Wake Up, Princess, the Movies Are Calling Andrea Mohin/The Gomes and Veronika Part in American Ballet Theater&#146;s version of the ballet, presented to Tchaikovsky&#146;s score at the Metropolitan Opera House. 4, 2007 In the land of Ballet Ever After, two heroines meet. Odette mimes (as she does in the traditional “Swan Lake”), “That lake is made of my mother’s tears.” Whereupon Aurora (as refashioned in ’s new production of “The Sleeping Beauty”) replies: “Lake! My mother cried me a river (remember the song?) when I pricked my finger and they thought I was dead. But my prince drank from the river’s waters and sailed up it to find me. ...” Skip to next paragraph Andrea Mohin/The van Hamel as the wicked Carabosse with others in American Ballet Theater&#146;s &#147;Sleeping Beauty.&#148; Ballet Theater’s new “Beauty,” which opened Friday night at the House, certainly isn’t hidebound by custom. Princess Aurora sleeps not a hundred years but half a millennium: When she pricks her finger, it’s the Middle Ages, and when she wakes, it’s the 18th century. This is “Sleeping Beauty” as seen through the lens of various movies. Like Aragorn in “The Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers,” Prince Désiré has a waterlogged dream (he not only drinks from the river but also swoons into it) that leads him toward a vision of Princess Right. The boat that sails him up her mother’s tears is like a Harry Potter Hippogriff. The King, the Queen and the Master of Ceremonies, Catalabutte, all come out of my favorite film, “The Court Jester” (“The pellet with the poison’s in the vessel with the pestle”), and the wicked Carabosse is auditioning, unsuccessfully, for “The Wizard of Oz.” The designer, , has provided sets, especially the Sleeping Beauty’s tiny castle with its fat little towers, that are very Disney indeed. The unashamedly bold, often cheerfully clashing colors in both décor and costumes (by Willa Kim) are Disneyesque too, though surely Walt’s artists would have imitated Corot much less crudely in the autumnal treescape behind the Hunt scene. There’s just one intermission in this staging, and only after it do you see quite how happy its directors — Kevin McKenzie, Gelsey Kirkland and Michael Chernov — have been to tell the old ballet anew, excising large chunks of the Hunt and Wedding, shifting the Act II entr’acte to accompany the Prince’s sleep and dream before the Vision and using Cinderella’s music to bring the fairies from the Prologue into the Wedding, giving the Gold Fairy’s music to the Lilac Fairy (as the This does become monstrously antimusical in one scene: when ’s music, softly depicting the sleeping palace (my favorite passage of this composer’s entire oeuvre, with its beautifully muffled oboe melody suggesting how beauty ripens in sleep like a chrysalis), is turned into an epic battle for the poor passive Prince, conducted between the wicked Carabosse, with her ghoulish minions, and the Lilac Fairy, with her elves. This is staged so that the directors seem to forget that it’s Aurora, not the Prince, who needs to be awakened and saved until mere seconds before the whole ballet’s climax. Bye-bye, Carabosse; hello, victorious Lilac; here’s the snoozing heroine; here’s the woken prince; kiss; hello darling; this must be love; rise and shine — all at pell-mell speed. That episode proves what the rest of the production suggests: that Mr. McKenzie, Ms. Kirkland and Mr. Chernov are concerned not with revealing Tchaikovsky’s music but merely with using it to their own dramatic ends. Yet that could be O.K. if they were choreographing the ballet from scratch as well as retelling it. This production doesn’t make the story boring, as some have done; in a Disneyesque way, this story has some tension and certainly surprise. Its problem is that these directors have saddled themselves with extensive chapters of the old choreography. Marius Petipa’s dances for the 1890 original are the climax of 19th-century ballet classicism, marrying royalist ceremony to fairy-tale beauty with the same fluency with which Homer interweaves the actions of mortal heroes and immortal gods in “The Iliad.” Their classicism isn’t just a matter of step-by-style manner but of structural connections, so that the ballet has long been viewed as the prototype of modern theme-and-variations ballets, with the fairy godmothers bringing a long glimpse of paradise into the human world, a paradise from which Aurora seems to draw in her later dances. We can even hear how Tchaikovsky hints that the awakened Aurora dances in her final solo to the staccato rhythms of the malign Carabosse, so that she now seems, at her wedding, like a woman who has tasted of the fruit of both good and evil. But Mr. McKenzie, Ms. Kirkland and Mr. Chernov give us merely a soloist’s view of Petipa’s choreography — take this bit from that Kirov video and that bit from the ’s — with no sense of its overall architecture. In the Prologue all six fairy solo variations have been carefully studied. But their ensemble passages, which can be the most transcendent sequences of the ballet, are a mishmash. Aurora’s dances at her Act I birthday, in the Act II Vision and in the Act II Wedding have been assembled in mix-and-match fashion without being staged as part of a cumulative, classical whole. This is scarcely a production for purists. Claiming to be “inspired” by Konstantin Sergeyev’s 1952 staging for the Kirov, it sees fit to lift his version of Aurora’s Vision solo wholesale. No inspiration is cited for its liberal quotations from Frederick Ashton’s supplementary dances. It is a safe bet that the production will look better at later performances. I don’t, however, envy Ms. Kirkland, returning to the stage tonight after more than 20 years, having to tackle this version of Carabosse; the great mime role has been reduced to standard old ham, which not even Martine van Hamel can make interesting. I have never seen Veronika Part look better than her opening-night Aurora, but she’s still a bore. A handsome, tall woman, she wears the same air of terminal nobility from first to last, apart from her irksome habit of letting her audience know which bits she finds difficult. Even when she’s on the music, she doesn’t seem to know why. She seems temperamentally wrong for Aurora, as does Michele Wiles as the Lilac Fairy, a role that needs a generosity that must encompass the whole world onstage. Since the marvelous Herman Cornejo is prevented by text and costume from being the definitive Bluebird he could be, the best dance moments are some patches of fairly standard virtuosity for Marcelo Gomes as the Prince. Apart from the general virile ardor of his style (which has yet to be ideally showcased), his musical timing is a distinct pleasure when the production allows it to be. Despite a recalcitrant horn section, Ormsby Wilkins conducted with showbiz vitality but less impact than one would have hoped. At no point is this a staging concerned with drawing its audience into the inexhaustible variety or even the knockout theatricality of Tchaikovsky’s score. American Ballet Theater performs through July 7 at the Metropolitan Opera House, Lincoln Center; (212) 362-6000 or metopera.org. “The Sleeping Beauty” runs though Saturday. (1 of 8) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. Out With a Flurry THEATER REVIEW; Let's Put on an Automat! Cue Cops and Cheesecake THEATER REVIEW; Who Needs a Narrative? Just Look Good and Bang on Stuff THEATER REVIEW; The Spirit of '50s and '60s Rocks in a Song Revue (1 of 8) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Martha Graham and Dancers - 1990 Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/arts/04conn.html?ex=1338609600&en=aae7aedf779e2a7d&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Creation Museum - Connections - Column - or Out of Eden, One Man’s Unicorn May Be Another’s Apatosaurus 4, 2007 There are some extraordinary fossils at the new Creation Museum, which opened last week in Petersburg, Ky., including one that preserves a perch with a half-eaten herring in its mouth. And there are some extraordinary creatures at the American Museum of Natural History in Manhattan, in a new show that also opened last week, including a life-size unicorn, a gold griffin and not a few dragons. What a strange looking-glass world these exhibitions create: real creatures in a museum devoted to religious ideas, and mythological creatures in a museum devoted to scientific ideas. The contrast is particularly haunting at a time when conflicts between reason and faith, science and religion, keep erupting. Old debates about Darwin and biblical truth persist. Presidential candidates are asked about their faith in evolution. And “Inherit the Wind” — a 1955 play about a 1925 trial about the right to teach Darwin’s 1859 theory — is revived on Broadway. Consider these two exhibitions. The Creation Museum, built by a Christian ministry called Answers in Genesis, displays models of dinosaurs, fossils and a few live animals, all put in service to the idea that Genesis is literally true, that the Earth was created in six days, and even the most “ancient” fossil would date from the time of Noah’s flood, not even 6,000 years ago. Natural objects are used to argue for the truth of what is, for nonbelievers, a mythological vision. Meanwhile, at the Museum of Natural History’s new exhibition of “Mythic Creatures,” the reverse is true: Mythological beings are used to demonstrate truths about the natural world. The exhibition suggests that many fantastical creatures were imaginative attempts to make sense of the enormous mastodon and mammoth fossils found by ancient cultures. The giant, the cyclops, the griffin: all were the results of efforts to flesh out the bones and relics of extinct species. Even mythological creatures, then, reflect scientific ambitions: How do we make sense of evidence? What are these giant bones, these relics of animals we have never seen? The creators of the griffin — half eagle, half lion — were early paleontologists who didn’t quite have their genuses straight and put the fossilized bones in the wrong place. In this, a scientist would argue, they resemble creationists: figures who, in trying to make sense of the world, ignore the findings of science to dwell in an imaginary realm where they put everything together according to an alien mold. But creationists would say that scientists are making this same error: They may have put the fossil bones together more plausibly but have then forged their own mythic universe in which one species turns into another over millions of years, and human intelligence arises out of haphazard chance. And it is worth recalling that Darwin’s theory was once so shocking and so threatening (even for its author) that it might as well have seemed to have been exhaled by one of those dragons now on display in New York. These are deeply held convictions, and there must be a way to explore their contrasts with more light and less heat than has been evident so far. But it wouldn’t be by simply accepting a symmetrical opposition, saying, perhaps, that one man’s griffin is another’s Apatosaurus. Neither is it possible simply to dismiss the opposition as if it were something alien and inhumane, as if there were no issues worth exploring: Science, after all, itself evolved out of faith and not always in rebellion to it. That ill-tempered ridicule is all too apparent in “Inherit the Wind,” which, on revisiting, almost has the air of agitprop (until it tries to backpedal at the very end). The Clarence Darrow-like lawyer, defending an innocent schoolteacher, is making a virtuous stand for independent thought against a town full of ignorant, Bible-thumping yahoos. The play’s authors — Jerome Lawrence and Robert E. Lee — give their fictional town of Hillsboro a villainous fire-and-brimstone preacher, a kangaroo courtroom and a prosecutor who is a crude version of William Jennings Bryan. The play almost solicits audience jeers. Yet the actual 1925 Scopes trial is far more interesting. The full transcript is considered so helpful to the fundamentalist cause that it is sold at the Creation Museum bookshop and is published by a religious college named after Bryan in the town where the trial took place. As for the trial itself, it was partly the result of an advertisement made by the American Civil Liberties Union , seeking a test case to challenge the Butler Act, which prohibited the teaching of evolution in Tennessee. A group of Dayton, Tenn., leaders thought this would be a terrific event to spur local commerce, so they solicited the friendly participation of John Thomas Scopes himself, who was never jailed as the character is in the play. Connections, a critic’s perspective on arts and ideas, appears every other Monday. (4 of 8) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. REVIEW; Adam and Eve in the Land of the Dinosaurs EXHIBITION REVIEW; Meet the Relatives. They're Full of Surprises. DIRECTIONS; The Evolution Of a Darwin Show One-of-a-Kind Souvenirs From Voyages of Discovery Creationism and Intelligent Design (4 of 8) &#x00bb; When Should a Kid Start Kindergarten? Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear The Other Machu Picchu Surge in Adoptions Raises Concern in Ethiopia 36 Hours in Florence Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? Editorial: Dick Cheney Rules Choice Tables | Barcelona: Five Catalan Stars, With Small Plates and Long Menus The Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Fingers That Keep the Most Treasured Violins Fit Say Push in Baghdad Is Short of Goal For Pornographers, Internet's Virtues Turn to Vices Papers Portray Plot as More Talk Than Action Iraq's Curse: A Thirst for Final, Crushing Victory Fever Builds for iPhone (Anxiety Too) Bush's Push on Immigration Tests His Base The Democrats' Second 2008 Presidential Debate 4 Accused of Plot to Blow Up Facilities at Kennedy Airport U.S. Not Pushing for Attack on Iran, Rice Says the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/arts/index.html Arts - Review | 'The Sleeping Beauty' Wake Up, Princess, the Movies Are Calling Andrea Mohin/The Gomes and Veronika Part in American Ballet Theater&#146;s version of the ballet, presented to Tchaikovsky&#146;s score at the Metropolitan Opera House. American Ballet Theater’s new production of “The Sleeping Beauty” certainly isn’t hidebound by custom. The Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Scale has always been a tricky issue for Mr. Wainwright. Rock on, but Hang on to Your Literary Gigs The Rock Bottom Remainders, whose members include Amy Tan, Dave Barry and Stephen King, are what every garage band dreams of becoming: people with word-processing day jobs who every now and then get to go on tour. Waxing Philosophical, Booksellers Face the Digital At BookExpo America, the publishing industry’s annual convention, the battering ram of technology was back. Video: At the BookExpo In or Out of Eden, One Man’s Unicorn May Be Another’s Apatosaurus Real and mythological creatures mingle in the strange looking-glass world of two new museum exhibitions. Books of The Times 'No Excuses: Concessions of a Serial Campaigner' Reviewed by JANET MASLIN Welcome to the moral limbo of political consulting, as outlined in sometimes routine, sometimes scorching detail in Robert Shrum’s memoir. Dance Review | Ben Munisteri Dance Projects Ballet With Headstands, and Other Quirky Contrasts In a new work, “Terra Nova,” Ben Munisteri sets the fast, difficult beaten steps to a dreamily slow song by Bjork. The effect is both odd and perfect in its place. Paris Hilton Begins Serving Jail Term Critics’ Choice | New Cds Flirting, but Serious, Kicking Off With a Hit By THE NEW YORK TIMES New releases from Rihanna, Marilyn Manson, Daddy Yankee, Jerry Bergonzi and Tiger Army. Theater Review | 'Crazy Mary' Bound by Blood, but Separated by a Breach in Sanity Sigourney Weaver and Kristine Nielsen serve their specialties with such gusto that it feels ungallant to point out that their characters are as artificial as hard-plastic dolls. Compiled by LAWRENCE VAN GELDER “Gone With the Wind” goes musical in London, “Pirates” sails on, Ford’s Theater is closed for renovations, “West Side Story” goes gold and more culture news. Complete coverage of this year's Tonys, including the full list of nominations, reviews, multimedia features and more. Questions for Audra McDonald The actress, who is nominated for a Tony Award for her role in the revival of "110 in the Shade," is taking readers' questions. James R. Oestreich of The Times reported from this year's the Spoleto Festival U.S.A., where Strauss, Weill and Glass came together, at least in spirit. Go to Blog » Art & Design &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Daredevil Dance Troupe Copes With a Casualty Out of Africa, Eclectic Visions Richard Serra: Man of Steel The Best Buildings You’ll Ever Hear Free Your Mind, and Your Spine Will Follow Why the Silver Surfer Isn’t the Coin of the Realm Flirting, but Serious, Kicking Off With a Hit You Hear Those People? They’re Animals! Even Wookiees Need a Good Belly Laugh Bound by Blood, but Separated by a Breach in Sanity Jeff Daniels and Alison Pill from the past 7 days enter keyword or date e.g. April 21, 2001 A brief examination of the money-comedy nexus in the world of Web video. Go to Blog » The Times's pop music critics discuss the latest albums and music events of the week. Download an MP3 Version Find your comprehensive television listings with this Longer editions of selected event listings in the New York area this week are now available online. The Week in Arts Leading Men Lead the Field June 3 - 10 FIND IT IN NYC MOST POPULAR - ARTS Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? The Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Rock on, but Hang on to Your Literary Gigs Architecture: The Best Buildings You&#8217;ll Ever Hear Waxing Philosophical, Booksellers Face the Digital Dance Review | 'The Sleeping Beauty': Wake Up, Princess, the Movies Are Calling Music: Concert Hall? How About Music Museum? Leading Men Lead the Field: Five Riveting Performances Make for a Stiff Competition A Jazzman So Cool You Want Him Frozen at His Peak Mama, Don't You Cry, A New Yellow Wiggle Will Sing Tyson Wants to Do Bollywood Movies Seacrest a Laughmaker in `Knocked Up' NY Philharmonic Links With Credit Suisse Hilton Completes First Night in LA Jail Female Hip - Hop Fights A Bad Rap Paris Hilton Begins Jail Term A Day Early Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Powerhouse Mechanic - 1920 Get plays, TV and music at home. Get The Times delivered at 50% off. Browse movie reviews from 1913. Post a job online today! Get closer to film, music, art and plays. $3.15 a week. Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. Buy, sell or rent a home. The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/books/04masl.html?ex=1338609600&en=231aa43108788978&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss No Excuses: Concessions of a Serial Campaigner - Robert Shrum - Books - Review - of The Times The Man Behind the Curtain: Political Strategy and Spin 4, 2007 Among the many stirring words written by Robert Shrum are these: “Since I was very young, I have had a profound reverence for this office I hold. I’ve been honored that you, the people, have entrusted it to me. I am proud of what we have accomplished together.” And about wife and daughter, Hillary and Chelsea: “Their forgiveness and love, expressed so often as we sat alone together this weekend, means far more than I can ever say.” Skip to next paragraph No Excuses: Concessions of a Serial Campaigner Illustrated. 521 pages. Simon & Schuster. $28. In his new book, “No Excuses,” Mr. Shrum — who ought to be making some — explains how he wrote that speech for at the height of the mess, knowing full well that the president was in the midst of “an unhappy vacation” on Martha’s Vineyard with his wife and daughter. As a political operative with more than three decades’ experience in the trenches, Mr. Shrum finds nothing peculiar in bending the truth or writing as a ventriloquist. He just regrets that President Clinton shied away from delivering the Shrum version, and that the Clinton legacy was thus diminished by the president’s choice to deliver his own defiant lies instead of the more artful lies of a celebrated speechwriter. Welcome to the moral limbo of political consulting, as outlined in sometimes routine, sometimes scorching detail in Mr. Shrum’s memoir. Although his writing is curiously bereft of his foremost professional skills — gripping rhetorical structure and a broad vision of the political landscape — he illuminatingly outlines the calculations that go into campaigning. And if he writes with a prominent sense of his own access, prescience and importance, he also writes with real experience of political image-making. His book is evidence that there is more to the people who dream up slogans like “the people, not the powerful” than great raw material for parody. “No Excuses” would be a much-discussed book even without its candid character assessments. But these are the things that leap out first. Mr. Shrum recalls the soreheaded, temperamental Edmund S. Muskie, who once threw a cigarette-dispensing crystal donkey at him; an icy (“behind the reflex smile, there was steel — but more about his ambition than his convictions”); a rudderless and worried who, despite having bowled over Mr. Shrum with dazzling presidential potential, will wish this book had never seen the light of day. Mr. Shrum recalls an who undertook one of the most important debates of his life wearing hastily applied orange makeup, cranked up on protein energy bars and diet cola. “It was a recipe for hyperaggression,” Mr. Shrum writes, recalling one reason things went badly for Mr. Gore that day. He also writes of Mr. Gore’s stretching the truth in ill-advised and unnecessary ways, as when he appeared on a Vanity Fair magazine cover touting as “A Threat Graver Than Terrorism.” Mr. Shrum’s expert role was to realize that calling this “the ‘other’ great threat to our future” would have been a safer, smarter move. The consultant’s job description, at least as set forth here, entails hoping the candidate is willing to be manipulated. It also means being ready to say anything, however untrue, when the candidate starts improvising. After Mr. Gore began claiming credit for a Shrum-written speech, Mr. Shrum thought he had to choose between making Mr. Gore look like a liar or simply lying himself. So he assured a reporter that Mr. Gore was “literally, truly and unquestionably” writing his own words. As he now acknowledges, it would have been possible to finesse this situation and still give an honest answer. “Everything in the speech reflects what he wanted in the speech,” his colleague Carter Eskew said of Mr. Gore, “if you know what I mean.” With his acute awareness of the importance of reputation, Mr. Shrum of course uses “No Excuses” to bolster his own. No, he has never guided any candidate to a presidential victory, unless you count Mr. Gore’s 2000 outcome. (He does.) But the book emphasizes, sometimes to the point of tedium, that he fared better with senators, governors and mayors. And he stresses the importance of the “Shrum Curse” (the thing that afflicts losing candidates who employ Mr. Shrum) and the “Shrum Primary” (in which competing candidates fight for the privilege of having Mr. Shrum’s services) for the simple reason that he enjoys the notion of a Shrum Anything. “No Excuses” includes many political emergencies in which the equivalent of a 911 call is a Shrum Summons. As “No Excuses” makes clear Mr. Shrum arrived at this level of power by being smart, collegial and, whenever possible, frank. He didn’t do it by being slick, and he hasn’t written a slick book. His warts-and-all insights will make “No Excuses” catnip for the politically inclined, even if some of it bogs down in minutiae. And he has packed a lifetime’s worth of anecdotes in here, some more revealing than others. Mr. Shrum has clear favorites (most notably Senator ), and goes to great lengths to present them flatteringly. But he is not beyond telling the story of how his team decided that a slender debate lectern would make Senator Kennedy look heavy. So Team Shrum contrived to snitch these props, substitute bigger ones and make sure the originals wouldn’t be found. For readers who hold any illusions about the political process, “No Excuses” cheerfully dispels them. Do you wonder why candidates often repeat themselves to avoid answering difficult questions? Did you imagine that Senator Lloyd Bentsen’s slap to (“Senator, you’re no Jack Kennedy”) happened spontaneously? Mr. Shrum discovered, from a column by Maureen Dowd in The New York Times, that Mr. Quayle was making Kennedy allusions. Then he wrote a great retort. Then came the rehearsing: “The moment was worded, practiced, and polished in the mock debates.” Then the line was delivered on television. And then the classic Shrum Spin kicked in. (8 of 9) &#x00bb; Need to know more? 50% off home delivery of The Times. Strategist For Democrats Ends Consulting Career In Middle of the Kerry Storm, A Man Known to Whirlwinds BRIEFING; A Team in Trouble United States Politics and Government (8 of 9) &#x00bb; When Should a Kid Start Kindergarten? Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear The Other Machu Picchu Surge in Adoptions Raises Concern in Ethiopia 36 Hours in Florence Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? Editorial: Dick Cheney Rules Choice Tables | Barcelona: Five Catalan Stars, With Small Plates and Long Menus The Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Fingers That Keep the Most Treasured Violins Fit Say Push in Baghdad Is Short of Goal For Pornographers, Internet's Virtues Turn to Vices Papers Portray Plot as More Talk Than Action Iraq's Curse: A Thirst for Final, Crushing Victory Fever Builds for iPhone (Anxiety Too) Bush's Push on Immigration Tests His Base The Democrats' Second 2008 Presidential Debate 4 Accused of Plot to Blow Up Facilities at Kennedy Airport U.S. Not Pushing for Attack on Iran, Rice Says the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/arts/music/04wain.html?ex=1338609600&en=9cebe7b04753cc22&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Rufus Wainwright - Music - Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Michael Falco for The singer-songwriter Rufus Wainwright, who likes to be well accessorized, has a new album, &#147;Release the Stars,&#148; that is being well received by critics and fans. 4, 2007 A few weeks ago, on his way to an appearance at the Union Square Barnes & Noble to promote his new album, “Release the Stars,” decided his all-black outfit was a little dour for a meet-and-greet. “Fashion emergency!” he said. So he dashed down to the antique-jewelry shop below his apartment and picked up a 1920s Czech glass necklace, which sparkled atop his black T-shirt. Good thing too: Mr. Wainwright’s fans expect a little flash. Around 800 of them came, some lining up as early as noon for a 7 p.m. appearance, to see him perform and autograph their CDs. Afterward they lingered, snapping photos of him and discussing their devotion. “I’ve learned a lot about myself listening to his music,” one man gushed. Does Rufus Wainwright know he’s fabulous? “I do feel like I live a fabulous life,” he said over afternoon dumplings at a Japanese teahouse near the Gramercy Park home he shares with his new boyfriend, Jörn Weisbrodt, an arts administrator. “And I know that’s why a lot of the critics get so mad at me sometimes, because they’re just really jealous.” He must be expecting an onslaught, because Mr. Wainwright, 33, the singer-songwriter-rhinestone-lover, has been superfabulous lately. His re-creation of concert garnered praise and awe, and he received a commission from the . “Release the Stars” immediately became a best seller in Britain when it arrived last month and has been a critical hit in the United States. He did five sold-shows at the Old Vic in London, and tomorrow he will begin a run of four sold-out nights at the Blender Theater at Gramercy in Manhattan. In New York he was in the midst of a publicity — and fashion — blitz: The night after Barnes & Noble he appeared on “Late Show With ” wearing lederhosen he had custom-made in Austria by a 25th-generation artisan who also fitted the Porsche family. But the glam life is not without pitfalls. Watching that show with a few friends from a private dining room at the boutique Hotel on Rivington, Mr. Wainwright had an epiphany: “It’s all commercials. It’s horrifying how many commercials there are and how it just ruins the experience.” But, he was quick to add, “I’d still love to be on ‘ ’ and, you know, have them visit my crib or whatever.” Scale has always been a tricky issue for Mr. Wainwright. Though he casually refers to himself as a superstar — in a tone that’s a few notes short of irony — his last few albums were more like cult hits. In the United States “Release the Stars,” which had its debut at No. 23 on the Billboard charts with just over 24,000 copies sold, was his highest ranking; by contrast the new album from another indie favorite, Wilco, came in at No. 4 that week. And it was only recently that he became too well known to have a profile posted on a gay cruising site. (The administrators took it down, thinking it was fake.) In the United States and Britain his most loyal audience tends to be gay men, teenagers and mother-daughter fans. (Several sets turned up at Barnes & Noble.) “There’s a tinge of sadness to their devotion,” he said. “It relates with the alienation that I bring up. So I still feel somewhat subversive, which is nice.” To promote that approach “Release the Stars” was meant to have an underground feel, recorded in Brooklyn with a Berlin detour to “go totally electroclash, get a weird haircut and maybe take up drug addiction again or something,” Mr. Wainwright said. Instead, when he got to Germany, “this kind of wave of, like, romanticism and grandiosity and sort of high culture really took hold of me,” he said. His critics — the jealous ones — might suggest he has always been in thrall to ostentation, so Mr. Wainwright enlisted Neil Tennant of the Pet Shop Boys to rein him in. It worked, sort of. “Remarkably, Mr. Wainwright infuses ‘Release the Stars’ with enough honest emotion to overcome the grandiosity, or at least undercut it a bit,” the critic Nate Chinen wrote in The New York Times. Mr. Wainwright would like to make a solo piano record, and several albums with his musical family. (His parents are the folkies Kate McGarrigle and Loudon Wainwright III; his sisters, Martha Wainwright and Lucy Wainwright Roche, often join his tours.) But he talks most excitedly — and most often — about his opera, a tale of a (fabulous) day in the life of a diva. “I really believe that opera’s a language,” he said. “I think it’s a whole parallel, separate world where all those characters exist. And once a composer of opera realizes that or discovers who those people are, as I have with this character who I’m writing about, it’s your mission to breathe life into this other being.” So Mr. Wainwright is in no danger of deflating. What would make his life more fabulous? “I’d love to play Madison Square Garden,” he said, “and get hounded and lose all sense of dignity.” (2 of 8) &#x00bb; Want to save this article?  Download the Times File Toolbar - get it now with TimesSelect. REVIEW; Another Gathering, Another Show MUSIC REVIEW; Judy at Carnegie Revisited, This Time Without Judy POP MUSIC REVIEW; Somewhere Over the Rainbow, Conjuring Judy Garland A Judy Is Born (2 of 8) &#x00bb; When Should a Kid Start Kindergarten? Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear The Other Machu Picchu Surge in Adoptions Raises Concern in Ethiopia 36 Hours in Florence Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? Editorial: Dick Cheney Rules Choice Tables | Barcelona: Five Catalan Stars, With Small Plates and Long Menus The Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Fingers That Keep the Most Treasured Violins Fit Say Push in Baghdad Is Short of Goal For Pornographers, Internet's Virtues Turn to Vices Papers Portray Plot as More Talk Than Action Iraq's Curse: A Thirst for Final, Crushing Victory Fever Builds for iPhone (Anxiety Too) Bush's Push on Immigration Tests His Base The Democrats' Second 2008 Presidential Debate 4 Accused of Plot to Blow Up Facilities at Kennedy Airport U.S. Not Pushing for Attack on Iran, Rice Says the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky NYT ESSENTIAL LIBRARY: OPERA Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
